Life, to me, is a continual unfoldment and years are simply human constructs meant to give us a sense of order and to delineate the human condition. Still, I will be quietly celebrating the turning of the page. I plan to pop the cork on a bottle of homemade wine made by my son, Coleman, from the grapes that we gathered from my vine, back on that sunny day in mid-September. No dirty dancing in a bar at midnight with someone I barely know, as I did way back when, when way too many Cosmopolitans and a sad heart made me think that was a good idea, or a reasonable facsimile of one.
Through multiple statements Go Daddy said it no longer supported the House version of the legislation, known as SOPA, nor had it ever backed the Senate version , or (Protect IP Act, or PIPA) and noted that it has been removed from the U.S. Congressional list of SOPA supporters.
Ron takes the task to Ann and tells her they’re to find a way to upgrade the water fountain hygiene around Pawnee, since everyone has taken to putting their mouths completely over the spout. The team has many solutions, many of them poor: Jerry wants to cage the spout while Tom just wants to sell gourmet water. As Chris and Ron entire the parks department to check up on progress, they’re greeted by a full on water fight and Andy embraces Chris in a water balloon filled hug. Ron’s bellow of “ATTENTION!” was surprising to say the least and definitely got the job done.
So since I am starting this challenge late on this fine Wednesday, I'll leave it open till next Thursday till midnight PST. BUT since I want to continue to have contests on Tuesdays, I'll still be putting up a new challenge next Tuesday. Promise this time! :D (Oh and I haven't forgotten about the prizes- I'll be writing those features and putting up those buttons of winners tonight! :D And Tiffany- I still owe you your prize! I'll hit you up on fb :))
Suddenly his mouth descended upon her sensitive skin, leaving a trail of kisses behind her earlobe and down the slender column of her throat. His fiery-hot tongue ignited a blazing inferno along her untouched flesh. Katarina moaned and draped her languid arms over his well-defined shoulders to keep her balance. She suddenly felt weak. Light-headed. Ready to pass out. She had to speak up, before she lost her nerve. “Please, Mr. Othman. If you have any respect for my honor, stop this madness!”
And now I have this ring
The Bird Man finds Ava. She dives into an alligator pond, is bit on the leg, wrestles the alligator, and gets away from it. She swims through a tunnel and the Bird Man doesn't find her again. She hears the crackle of a park ranger's radio and is rescued. The ranger asks if she's related to Osceola Bigtree, who has also just been rescued. Ava, Ossie, and Kiwi are reunited and go to "the Chief's" hotel room. The family is reunited. They stay on the mainland. Ossie is on medication. Ava doesn't tell anyone about the Bird Man or what happened to her. The last paragraph ends with:
A little note if taking trains in Paris
"I dont think they need anymore slot machines.."
Ballast Point Victory at Sea
Lots of tips for working with book bloggers and running a blog tour that stands out!
Welcome to Twitter Hop Thursday, hosted by Simply Stacie,The King's Court IV, Little Yaya's, and Review Retreat!
EEK... Frogs jumping out of the Cauldron
Free, no bookings taken
“The enhancements to HARP announced in October, such as removing the maximum loan-to-value limit, are beginning to show up in additional refinance volume during the first quarter,” Nothaft said in a news release.
1155 **D-III/24(A)/1993. “Lessons from Oklahoma.” The School of Law, Oklahoma City University, Oklahoma City, Oklahoma. (Incorporated in Item C-1995(4), above, pp. 21-24.)
So, I basically don’t have too many fears about the future as a single guy. I have economic fears about the future, but since I’m a good saver and having been saving all these years, I’m not worried about taking care of me because I’ve got the money to do that. And I don’t think things will get too bad before I die. Basically my fears for myself alone are because young people are being neglected by their working parents, and indoctrinated in the public schools.
-hypothyroidism
Happy craftin', and we'll see you tomorrow with a brand new Elements Challenge! (In the meantime, you have until tonight at midnight EST to play with the CURRENT Elements Challenge - "little wee ones"!)
enjoy a little peak into our every day lives,
I’ll keep my eyes open and track their movements.
The second part to the phlog is more of a problem; while post taunt, the phlog pyro does crits and also shrugs off 90% of all incoming damage while taunting. Common sense dictates here to -run-. Rocket jump, sticky jump, GRU, whatever. Once the pyros weapon has stopped glowing, resume pelting with projectiles. An alternative approach would be to have a spy backstab him – while in critmode, the phlog pyro suffers from tunnel vision, much in the same way that ubercharge might.
Spotted some potential pieces I would like to showcase and fingers crossed, we'll be able to come to a deal.
And it was unearthly hurting that he, never accidentally, erased us – including me. Never, not even once at all, did he, for heaven’s sake, give a reasonable elucidation on the said matter. And other turmoil which I will not elaborate much further.
“Sure, okay.” Cora said, vaguely.
Once you have received Jesus Christ as your Lord and Saviour, the Holy Spirit dwells in your heart and you belong to Him forever. It is very clear that there is nothing that can remove you from the love of God (Romans 8:38,39)), and you are sealed until the day of redemption. There is a judgment for Christians which will take place immediately after we are “taken away.” That judgment has to do with our life on this earth and we will be rewarded for those things which we have done that have been pleasing to God. 1 Corinthians 3:12-15 tells of this judgment and even if you have no rewards, your salvation is sure and you will enjoy the glories of heaven for all eternity.
The flavors of the cake is hard to describe. It isn't like a regular pancake. It is sweeter but light and spongy. I could probably eat it all day, everyday. About two years ago, I started my hunt for the recipe. The first step was to find the exact name of it. I knew it as little pancakes and it took a while to find it. I started to give up and began to believe that the recipe was created by the little old lady with the cart. Then there it was right there on my screen - HONG KONG CAKES or Egg Waffles. Now narrowing down the different recipes. I found a few that recipes that asked for custard powder. I had no idea what was custard powder. After even more research, I came to realize it was vanilla pudding. Before I was able to test the different recipes, I had to find the right pan. The shape is not a regular flat pancake but it is kinda a foot ball. I first got an Ebelskiver Pancake Pan. It kinda worked but not exactly right. I was not happy with the taste. I tried every recipe I was able to find but it wasn't right.
The Annaberg Sugar Mill Plantation Ruins comprise the Annaberg Historic District in the Virgin Islands National Park. Sugar plantations were abundant in this region throughout the 19th century. Though originally grown in India, Columbus brought sugar to the Caribbean, where it thrived. You’ve heard “Cotton was King” in reference to the US South. Well, here “Sugar was King.” In 1758, a Dutch immigrant, Salomon Zeeger, purchased the property and named it Annaberg in honor of his wife Anna. Though its namesake, the Zeegers did not construct the mill, which dates to ca. 1800. An Irish merchant,James Murphy, purchased many adjacent properties, including Annaberg, to create his sugar estate. Sugar product continued on the plantation long after his death in 1808.
24. Patient guidance is key to understanding
Today it's YOUR turn! Write a review about my blog, with any suggestions, likes, dislikes, anything at all you'd change! if enough people ask for it, I'll do it!
How did she know this? She was Jewish; she knew the Scriptures. She knew Jehovah-rapha from such scriptures as “I am Jehovah your healer” (Ex. 15:26 Masoretic Text), and “But to you who fear My name, the Sun of righteousness shall rise up and healing will be on His wings.” (Mal. 4:2 Masoretic Text).
In another incident, two men facing attempted rape and assault charges escaped from the Tamara holding cells in East London on Friday after they overpowered two police guards.
and they all fit!
Oh Donna, won’t ya pick me up tomorrow? I need to get out of this place I’m in, and get my life in order. Let’s go far away from here, and not come back until the coast is clear. I’m fallin’, thinkin’ of you, I count the days and all the funny things we do. I’m so sorry, now you ignore me, tried to explain, but it’s such a long story. Saw you in the lobby, now ya never call me, you smiled, then pretended that you never saw me.
Both sides in the Syrian conflict once again showed that they’re both evil.
The RSVP's to parties?
If you weren’t so wonderful
You can also see how old and corroded it was getting inside.
"The Pope was embroiled in new controversy this weekend over a letter he signed arguing that the 'good of the universal church' should be considered against the defrocking of an American priest who committed sex offences against two boys. It was dated 1985, when he was in charge of the Congregation for the Doctrine of the Faith, which deals with sex abuse cases."
I heard the auction hammer
Caution should be exercised while adding oil also during the process of beating the dough don and rolling. Do not be tempted to add more oil. The end result will be oil dripping falis.
3) Everyone takes the buses here, and nobody rides for free (no subsidized bus passes), so they seem a lot safer/nicer than the buses I had to ride back in Boston– where only people too poor to afford a car would ride the bus. On the buses here, I never find myself surrounded by reeking unwashed drunks, ranting schizos, and sketchy characters I am half afraid will rob me and/or follow me home when I get off the bus. It’s all just people who, like me, are trying to get from one place to another.
I think it's time to get the guest bedroom spring cleaned. :-) I can't sit on the back porch, so it's the perfect day to clean and organize!
84 comments
I also know that many other bloggers are in the same position I am in. So I came up with an idea, this is where BEA comes in. Everyone working in that conference works with books everyday. I want to go around asking them what they majored in, where they went to college and what they would recommend someone like me to do.
It is this blog that brought me to her husband's attention and gave them a way to contact me. It turns out, they are my second and second cousins once-removed (if you follow) on my father's side - the Irish contingent. They are related to my grandmother's siblings and so we share the same great-grandparents. (Correct me, if I'm wrong, Colin!) How exciting!
But in my soul I'm glad I know,
Oh yeah...when I mean huge I mean it is 4 feet long and a foot high!
The Brooklyn Bridge was, of course, his crowning achievement, although he didn’t live to see it become anything more real than a design on paper. Roebling’s son, Washington Roebling, took over as chief engineer of the bridge, although he himself was also soon struck with serious illness. While working within the compressed air of one of the bridge tower’s caissons (a compressed air foundation) beneath the East River, Washington contracted “the bends.” For the rest of the bridge’s construction, he was bound to his bed and would send instruction to the site through his wife Emily. He was able to oversee construction from the window of his home on Columbia Heights.
I was also active in the Wisconsin Library Association and librarians from around the state were contacting the principal with their concerns. I was not alone in standing up against this censorship attempt. It wasn't just my colleagues around the state, it was also many of the teens themselves. Attempting to censor a book often has the opposite impact the censor intends - the very people who the censor doesn't want to read the book hear about it and wonder what the big deal is and read it. Almost every teen in the small high school had read the book by the time the school board decided to put it on a newly created reserve shelf for it - requiring a signature for teens younger than 18. The censors make a whole lot of money for the authors of books they want removed from libraries!
y que rápido se nos destruyen los sueños.
Nathan MacGregor / Pages from a Journal / 110
“I collect coats for kids year-round and clean and repair them before they’re donated to agencies and schools for distribution. I will also clean the garments of anyone who’s going on a job interview as part of a National Cleaners Association program,” said Victoria Aviles, owner of Bridge Cleaners & Tailors.
Not that a ban makes any difference, Arsenal seem to do very well indeed without the manager on the touchline. Pat Rice has capably stood in Arsène’s shoes – preferring a slightly wider fit but not complaining – although the former captain’s own preference is to take retirement at the end of this season, persuaded to continue for one more year last summer. Talking to the media is something he probably will not miss.
Karna is 16 years old and has passed his Selenoren this year. During the summer there was the yearly Rising Festival where he completed the third Selenor and became adult in the eyes of the clan. His clan is Soli, same as Khuure’s was.
She grew weary trying to guess.
There are so many different opinions out there as to what is the ‘best’ way to live and, specifically, eat healthily, that sometimes I find it confusing to say the very least. Who to believe, who to listen to, what to take seriously and what to dismiss as just pop-science or fad.
To repeat: hundreds of millions of dollars have been spent to investigate invisible forces allegedly sending a breeze through the cosmic curtain. “Ripples?” “Fabric of the universe?” It’s like spending taxpayer dollars to investigate how exactly Yoda levitates inanimate objects. Such exorbitant expenditures represent the outcome of a tragic politicization of science, merely marking the latest episode in the history of one of the most enduring scientific scare-mongering theories ever perpetrated.
4 ounces prosciutto, thinly chopped.
Today was my Personal Wellness “final.” (It was really just a unit test) It took all of 14 minutes for me to finish the test. But during that 14 minutes, some girl behind me was coughing. Probably for a good 7 minutes. I’m not very patient when I’m taking tests- I get insanely irritated by little things. This was one of them. I really wanted to turn around and force a stupid cough drop down her throat. I mean, seriously! I probably would have been slightly more forgiving had it actually sounded like she had a cold or something, but it definitely sounded as though she were faking the coughs. That was actually the part that pissed me off. And now that I’m back in the dorm, I was thinking about other little things that piss me off when they happen during quiet parts of class or during tests. And here they are:
-Cornbread Stuffing (also an invention: veganized boxed cornbread from the USA, roasted chestnuts, dried cranberries, onions, plenty or salt, pepper,. and fresh sage, held together with a bit of vegetable stock. THEN I am going to grease up some muffin tins and make little individual stufffing servings! I'm hoping this will be like a mixture between bread pudding and stuffing. Total off the cuff experiment due, once again, to lack of baking dishes.)
And if you're running a pub or bar and you find yourself in this position, wait and see what happens first before deciding to take the beer off sale. If you get loads of negative feedback, then fair enough, cut your losses and remove it from sale, but don't be too hasty. If you DO have to take it off then you owe it to yourself, your customers, and also the brewery responsible, to pick up the phone and tell them why you had to stop selling their beer. Any self-respecting brewer should be able to handle criticism. so long as it's constructive and fair, so tell them the truth, without being too negative about it.
Announcing an Eco-idea competition sponsored by EcoTensil is offering a eco-gift basket worth $200!
This is the attitude we need to take in our approach to life change. It’s not always a pitched battle against the self though. Sometimes, its tactical warfare, sometimes, its strategic meal skipping, sometimes it’s letting yourself run out of cookies, sometimes its just tracking how often you do something to make a habit. It is still warfare and it has an effect. The old habits are eventually defeated and pacification of the “occupied territory” begins and we move on to new levels of growth.
Of the big four 70’s prog rock bands – ELP, Yes, Genesis and Pink Floyd – ELP along with Genesis never really gelled with my musical tastes being to self-indulgent even for a prog rock band. But upon hearing this remastered version of the band’s live album recorded on their 1973/74 world tour I am more of a fan. Time has obviously been a great healer in this case, although Genesis still remains off my musical menu.
Spence Campbell (REP) 1.55% 15
Until then, from my home to yours,
cover rooms
I read through both recipes, and settled on the Chocoflan. I had more of the ingredients on hand, and a pan that it would fit in. I cheated a little bit, and made a test cake the day before our dinner party. Good thing. More about that later.
When she isn’t busy breaking down entirely, Brownie does other things to punish her owner for being poor: She burns oil like a binge drinker. She conspires with speculators to raise the price of gasoline to unaffordable levels. She and her insurance agent friends consistently raise the rates for no reason, and somehow she’s made sure that auto repair shops keep the price for fixing her equivalent to a full month’s wages, no matter what the problem is.
The card/box card is 1 inch thick; so in case you would like to try this shape, I recommend you make it thinner, say half an inch, depends on how high your embellishing is.
Complete Your Persona With Fashion Watches!
I was not the only one who loved it. It was surprisingly and intensely popular with older ladies. I had them stop me on the street, and chat my up in the ladies room. They called me brave, and fun, and "so cute" and applauded my willingness to step outside of the box and have a little fun with my outfit. And they made me feel like a super star.
Lastly, my source of movie information mainly comes from imdb.com because i do find their rating system is fair, i do find some underrated and overrated movies there but who cares anyway... :)
On the basis of extensive modelling, the review specified some indicative ranges within which these loadings should be determined by negotiation between the states and the Commonwealth.
So the Other Half had an interview for a new job yesterday and was successful, and we took the kids out for tapas to celebrate.
Caller: "Hi can I speak to Suzie Townsend?"
is a young boy who can see ghosts, and soon he will have to deal with ghosts, zombies and adults in a race to break a curse that has taken grip of his town. Visually the movie excites me, and I think that we need more children’s movies that delve into darker territory. Also any trailer that uses Season of the Witch as its music choice, instantly gets two thumbs up.
One of Louise’s larger ideas concerned something she called “Intrinsic Validation”. Behind this term is the belief that “the most powerful validation you can give another is to care enough to step into their world and listen without giving advice, feedback, or criticism.”
1) The ANC was seen as the organization behind several major terror attacks. Brett's assertion that these attacks were objected to by the ANC's leadership is highly debatable. In fact, after the Church Street bombing (aimed at a military building, but which mostly killed civilians), Oliver Tambo, ANC's leader in exile, declared it a legitimate target. Even one who had in fact read the Freedom Charter would have been horrified by this attack in rush hour, in which civilian casualties were inevitable.
Salerno Blood Orange Liquor
The first flash of genuine colour that I can see moving is my dog.
And it's not a boring read, it's just a really really really irritating read. I was about a third of the way through when I pulled Andrew Birkin's J.M. Barrie and the Lost Boys out of my shelves to remind myself what a good book on the subject is like. (And seriously, Andrew Birkin's book is what you need if you want a better picture of the truly eerie story of James Barrie and his relationship with the five young Llewellyn-Davies brothers; trust me, Finding Neverland is nowhere near what really happened.)
Once I get off my tired butt, I will once again add care sheets, better photos, and of course kid guides, and a pitch for some upcoming projects that I already have in the works. The nice thing is that my experience with Buggy Zoo has given me the framework for a much bigger (streamlined) idea.
On the fifth floor of the Ansari Business Building at the University of Nevada's Reno campus is a gem of a museum, currently showing a fascinating exhibition of Western Archaeology. The University of Nevada, Reno Anthropology Research Museum is part of the Anthropology Department. At the time of writing (December 2011) the exhibition called Archaeology of the Mining West features artifacts from saloon digs at Virginia City, the Silver Boom town featured in the 1960s TV show Bonanza and now in my new Western Mysteries series of books for kids aged 9+. (There is also a small case of items from one of the excavations of the ill-fated Donner Party, where pioneers had to resort to cannibalism to survive.)
Let the Team of Advanced Energy Soultions show the path forward. Be part of the solution…save energy…save money…save the planet! Contact one of our Energy Consultants at 478-225-2383.
This last year has been a very difficult one in my personal and buisness life however I am VERY excited for what this next year has to offer. I am excited to announce that I have added a few more team members in my Stampin Up family and My wonderful and awesome "Sister", more on that later, will be joing me in my Three Crafty Monkeys business venture.
Our sponsor this week is:
governor in May 2007.
Favorite books of all time?
They sculpted figures in the water, expressing their dismay
And here are some thoughts on the imagination in Kant:
We’re not even close to meeting our 2020 target of being less than 2005 levels, based on current gov’t initiatives.
Our nation’s vision of homeland security is a homeland that is safe and secure, resilient against terrorism and other hazards – where American interests and aspirations, and the American way of life can thrive. In seeking to fulfill this vision, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) aspires to avoid burdening minority and low-income populations with a disproportionate share of any adverse human health or environmental risks associated with our efforts to secure the nation.
Be there and be groovy!
The Man and OG are out on a date, to a UT Women's Volleyball game. The Man likes volleyball, and swears it has nothing to do with the six-feet-tall amazons in tight shorts; OG likes dates with her daddy, popcorn, M&Ms, and sanctioned occasions to scream. I got to hang out with YG, go for a walk, chat with the neighbors, and then read to YG for a long, long time, without any competition from OG. Perfect evening all around. Well, OK, there was the not-quite-potty-trained-daughter-with-the-diarrhea-and-the-smearing incident, but best save that for another posting.
I feel very guilty because I was nominated for a blog award and have yet to get around to doing my portion...but I will...I PROMISE!! I just have to get ahead on some school work. I have 1.5 weeks left of this class and then I will have a MUCH needed break for a few short weeks over the holidays.
answers from the queen were to no avail
"It's only average," Tom said meanly.
Gillian Welch blames her long absence from recording — it's been 8 years since her last album, Soul Journey — on a long creative drought, but one wouldn't guess it from the way her latest album immediately emerges as a continuation of the singer's soulful, self-assured approach to classic country. On opener "Scarlet Town," the signature elements are all in place: Welch's lightly twanging voice belting out a sad song over the agile guitarwork of longtime collaborator David Rawlings. With the aching "The Way It Will Be," Welch and Rawlings have written one of their very best songs, and they immediately follow it with the similarly titled "The Way It Goes," shifting from the ambiguous war-as-heartache metaphors of the first song to an equally bracing series of miniature narratives about downtrodden souls. The album is mostly downbeat and quiet, with the emphasis pared down to Welch's voice and the low-key guitar interplay, giving the album a stark intimacy that makes Welch's melancholy vocals all the more affecting. [buy]
Romans 8:28-29 is a promise for all Christians and not just for those Christians who pray in tongues.
Call the Insurance man - check
Publication Year: March, 2012
According to Duncan, the proposed legislation will gut environmental protection but her claim was rejected by Conservative MP Michelle Rempel, the parliamentary secretary to Environment Minister Peter Kent.
Don't be drag, just be a queen
Rudeness is the weak man’s imitation of strength.
Cost Benefit Analysis
Garlic lime chicken, asparagus, Stove Top stuffing
We now have six and about one-third house districts in Clay. District 8 comes south and grabs Lawson and stops just shy of Kearney. I’m not going to throw a fit about the reapportionment. The word is the whole process was a mess with many of the Democrats acting like really mature middle school students. So, the process was thrown to the judges and we ended up with this. The odds are good that any legal challenge won’t go anywhere, so we may have to just deal with it. The solution is simple; find good candidates and win.
so we spent a month doing research.
I couldn't even get through Tina's post because I saw red. It seems a reasonable question, and I certainly was asked this enough times that I know the question is well-intended. But the result is what infuriates me.
David Murray, 45, got the £50 fixed penalty after wardens saw 11-year-old pooch Elliott crouching in the street.
When someone says, “You’ve got soul!,” what do they mean?
"HRNNNNNNNNNNNNG!" The moan echoed through the bathroom. The stall was shaking with the force of the zombie's blows.
Selection Process: Early entries are encouraged. Previewing will occur on a daily and weekly basis by Dave Bown Projects as submissions are received.
For years I've been dreaming of visiting this glorious, romantic, mysterious and beautiful city. The fantasy of sitting at a cafe, sipping a café au lait and littering the table with shards of croissant left me breathless. Tearing off the end of a baguette so fresh that I can hear it. Bread so enticing that I have to stop in the middle of the sidewalk so I can concentrate on that crusty piece of baguette and ingrain the flavor forever in my memory.
12. Sharing a birthday with McG does nothing to negate how cool he is.
getting comments on my blog
PACER’s TeensAgainstBullying.org website offers relevant and interactive information in a teen-friendly way. Teens can find strategies to deal with bullying, ways they can stand up for other kids, and ideas for how they can bring the bullying prevention message to their school. PACER’s KidsAgainstBullying.org website is also specifically designed for elementary-aged children and uses a cast of animated characters to share bullying prevention strategies.
Look at these facts:
After getting situated at our B&B, we headed out for a group dinner at “La Cave.” No English translation is needed–the restaurant is literally built INSIDE a cave! How many people can say they’ve eaten inside a gigantic piece of rock? Well, now I can…
Anyway, I went off to Canadian Tire, another hardware store and asked another attendant for help in finding this lamp kit. Sure enough, she points me in the right direction and says 'I'm so glad those days are done for me!' Well, it's good to know I'm not the only mom who has to help her kids with school work! I'm happy to report I found the lamp kit!
It has always baffled me how anyone becomes offended by another’s personal opinion. How do they have energy to care about it? Particularly the opinion’s of strangers.
Scot Meacham Wood (you may know him as Tartanscot) came to my rescue outside the main market building. "Patricia!" he called from across the street and after a hug hello I begged off from going around with him as I had forgotten my phone charger and was almost out of juice.
Safeguard of Article 135(1): Though civil servants have no security of tenure, they can be removed only after prescribed procedures. Article 135(1) states that no member of the public services (except a member of the armed force) may be dismissed or reduced in rank by an authority subordinate to that which had the power to appoint him.
ready for action
Level 17: MP Cost: 35, Damage: 258%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 3 times, 17% chance to stun the enemy for 4 seconds.
in their stead,
Salon networking night is a good opportunity to chat with the talented New England designers and that drive New England's creative scene. Be prepared to exchange ideas, promote your line and chat about yourself and your work. If you are new to Design Salon, come check us out. If you haven't checked in for awhile, now is the time.....
For baked fries just cut washed russet potatoes (skin on) into match sticks, drizzle with olive oil, salt, pepper and bake on a sheet pan in a 425 degree oven for 15-20 minutes, depending on thickness, or until browned and crispy. Makes you want to fire up that grill and throw on your grillin’ apron, doesn’t it?
and where we went and what we ate,
embellished, of course, with a few angels and rays of light. And the practice seems to be spreading out of the Mexican-American community and onto the rear windows of all manner of other Californians.
Nice you desire your overall impression? Belstaff affordable opt for may also create a unique impression. cause you to function as the passionate!Beautiful together with great your Belstaff coat, huge circular dog collar toned innovative design exhibits your throat remnants. Excellent dress, which will get delivering your own best laces and ribbons supporting to get furthermore effective at from the standard a sense the specific level. Higher part of a cotton wood ear, wide lace top top and pretty stitching hair, therefore jacket in a flash boost the appeal of high-class. Comfortable brownish knitted fabrics, became a member of the particular gleaming rare metal, allow you to much more coloration.
1. Ron Paul DOES NOT get the nomination and runs as a third-party candidate:
I never ever thought it would have grown so big! i'm so very proud of my design Team girls past and present and of course special mentions to Vee & Joanne who have been with me from Day one!
Hairco (our "pet" house gecko) is really nice and is starting to turn into a big lizard.
Today I am introducing my newest fabric line, called Fruitful Hands. It was inspired by my book of the same name. If you go over to the Henry Glass blog and leave a comment, you will be entered to win an autographed copy of my book- But hurry- you have until next Friday!
Second, spend some time in the word. We live in the age of tiny technology. If you have a smartphone, you can access the mobile version of biblegateway.com, or you can download the youversion app or the logos app. All these are free, and they are great resources for reading the bible in whatever translation you desire on the go. I use all three of these at different times, and they are really great! More than just reading the word, though, just read a verse or two, and meditate on that passage. You will find God often speaks to you through His word in ways that cut right to what you are dealing with, even if it’s a struggle with being patient while you wait for that incredibly slow train that is cutting the town in half while you are trying to get the kids to school on time.
Why can’t life always be like this, she thought, smiling and smiling at the lovely room with its cheerful wallpaper and the gay curtain that hid the waste-pipe of the washbasin. She revolved slowly in front of the open window, the street turning with her: the shining bonnets of the cars at the kerb, the spearheads of the painted railings, the thin black trees that were bouncing in the wind.
I did enjoy laying out by this fabulous pool
Purchase Candy
I just happen to be off tonight. I usually always have to work on my Birthday.
One sentence description of the book
Next up for Lukas, Nike Outdoor Nationals in the 2 mile. This may be his toughest test yet. Fellow Chicago area runner (and US #2 at 3200, 8:51) Jeff Thode will look to rebound after his performance in the Mile at the MDG. US #3 (8:51 3200 and Footlocker runnerup) Trevor Dunbar of Alaska as well as US #1 Miler Andrew Springer (4:02) should all be pushing the race into sub 8:50 territory.
* Most importantly if selected you can start creating for us straight away.
Note how the Christian Bible are using capital letters in these verses. It’s like saying: when you are short of arguments, then you raise your voice! Before we take a verse from the Jewish Bible and trying to apply to a situation, we must a) determine if this is a proper quotation or is it misquoted, b) is it a prophecy at all c) is the prophecy taken out of context, d) we need to find out if the prophecy is a so called short-term prophecy, that is, it has already been fulfilled during the time of the Prophet, or is it a long-term prophecy to be fulfilled far into the future or e) is it a fabricated verse (HaShem forbid!)? Many times Christian scholars, in all well meaning, are reading New Testament without a thought what the authors have intended. We must go a step further than the authors of the New Testament, not just swollow every statements made in the Christian Bible. We must ask ourselves, why did the author quote this text from the Jewish Bible the way he did? We will see further on in my texts, many examples of misquoted verses, verses taken out of context and sometimes, even fabricated verses, and that is very serious according to the Book of Revelation, no further explanation needed. The strangest of all, is that often times it is the authors of the New Testament who do the errors, and we read what they say, without questioning the claims.
His office later sent a written reply that the senator believes “the Senate would benefit from more closely resembling America’s diversity.” His aide theorized that Nelson was probably in a hurry to get to his next meeting and that’s why he could not answer on the spot.
My best opportunities for creative writing are first thing in the morning, last thing at night and being trapped on long train journeys - a habit I picked up when I used to travel up to London regularly from the West Country.
comes so serious in their attempts to win the championship.
The last three times I have seen her, she has asked about the Spouse Sparrow. By name. And then she blushed.
An uprising began. Under the direction of the AD emails denigrating the Board started to flow, flyers appeared from anonymous sources, gossip/innuendo about the Board ran rampart and neighbors started to turn against neighbors. Those who were once friendly to each other stopped speaking. There became a sense of “Them” (those supportive of the Board) against “Us’ (those who disagreed with the Board). Followers of AD would not engage those who did not agree with them. The division of Happy Times Homeowner Association had begun.
So far, so abstract. In practice, what does it matter if I’m a Cheech or a David? Can’t I just continue writing and pretend no one has noticed? I suppose it depends on why you want to write. All over the internet you can find blog posts from aspiring writers entitled things like, ‘I AM a writer!’ containing bold admissions along the lines of: ‘There, I said it: I’m a writer. A person who writes’ (find your own examples – they’re too tedious for me to revisit). These people are David Shayne before the fall, not hungry enough even to stretch out a hand for an apple from the tree of self-knowledge. Because writing is the means to an end, or so it should be, and the word ‘writer’ is more than a rusting halo to be worn to impress all the other would-be angels.
However, to reduce addiction to a character defect, and to claim all addicts and alcoholics are merely addictive personalities does a severe disservice to those living in addiction, and those who have triumphed over their addiction. Experience has taught me, both intensely personal, and from extensive observation of others, that addiction is never that simple. I believe this is especially true for women, because it is most often women who are subject to childhood trauma and sexual abuse, and these women are then are left to somehow pick up the pieces from those experiences without an instruction manual.
Why is it, then, that man is so much more concerned what others think about him rather than God’s approval of him? What others think is really not that important for He is the ultimate One with Whom we have to do. Pleasing man is but a temporal thing, but pleasing God has eternal values in view. But then, again, what natural man thinks of eternity?
OK, the ice-cream manufacturers are giving something away and the publishers are paying but the end result is the same: the customer buys what they see.
A Ministry of Justice statement said: “Arrangements are in place to ensure that probation staff are able to undertake their duties and we are confident that the situation will be resolved swiftly. There is no risk to the public.”
Next, you peel back the glitter sheet exposing the silver side. This is the side you stick to the adhesive. I just slipped my heart right in the middle. Then, rub the glitter on just like a rub-on. In fact, I use my old rub on stick to make sure all the bits and ends are stuck down.
It’s my sunny spot all winter as I peruse my perennial plant catalogs, dreaming of all the possibilities that exist. It’s my sunny spot in the spring as I watch what started as little seeds of hope last fall, curl a brand new leaf open to the sun. It’s my sunny spot all summer as I relish in the fruits of my labor. Flowers blooming, bees humming and beautiful energy rising from its colorful bursts, bouquets of fragrant blooms abound. And it’s my sunny spot in the fall as I watch my hard working plants slowly cower down to rest, and I plant new seeds, tubers, rhizomes and roots of hope for next spring.
I was really impressed and excited by these wines, so I am looking forward to seeing New York’s Finger Lakes and telling you all about them. It really is wonderful to try wines from a serious wine region that are almost completely new to us in this part of the world.
Their beauty is a side-effect:
2011-07-12 07:51
***Channeling my Aunt Bernice, don't ya know..
A local singer, Joi Tsai, made an interesting comment. She said that although the idea of your other half having a close friend of the opposite sex may be unsettling to some, some people do have big hearts. What she meant was, there are people who can love many at the same time.
I’d like to go through some of the LGBTQ youth centres that we have here and pass out surveys to see how other gay teenagers view this kind of treatment and whether other people witness more aggressive cases of homophobia!
Hyacynths - by far the yummiest smelling spring flower in my humble opinion. I have some in a vase on my bedside table right now and it is a treat to wake up to that smell.
Sharia did not have long to wait. Soon enough the ringing tread of her adversaries assaulted her ears, and a few seconds later the three warriors burst into the room with wild staring eyes. Sharia held her breath and pressed up against the leg of the statue. The leader motioned one warrior to go left while the other circled around the right, checking doorways as they went. He then raised the small oil lamp he carried, and strode towards the statue, looking up at its massive frame and trying to decipher its enigmatic expression. Just then a warrior shouted and held up the sandal clasp.
After that report was published online , Paul White who had help place Ray Johnsons story online and had a written an article , distanced himself from the whole affair.
I wrote to ask “exactly which Bible-believing fundamentalist is a self-righteous Pharisee,” but he did not reply.
"A paleontologist," he said, chewing on his finger.
02-Dennis Brown-Lips Of Wine
I’d be a little cautious about the veracity of the quotes in this compilation (Box’s famous line about how “all models are wrong but some are useful” is misattributed, which makes one wonder about the accuracy of the other quotes). But there a number of other zingers which I hope were actually said:
BNW: READING: Our Times on the Street Where I Live by Charles Mee (Directed by Tara Bast)
For the most part, I feel that parenting is a two-person job. I understand there are many single mothers and fathers out there doing a phenomenal job and I would never discredit their commitments to parenting — I just feel (and have interpreted such sentiments from the sentiments of single parents) that single parents are often times playing a dual role in parenting, understanding that it is a dual role. I genuinely believe a boy without a father will seek out a male role model despite having a loving, strong mother. Perhaps that means keeping him active in sports, under coaching, but I believe that. I also believe that there is no greater love, and should be no greater love than a mothers love for her child — carrying and delivering a life that has only known the sound of your voice and heart beat, you are the origin of our absolute existence. Cherish that despite however ungrateful we may be at times. I promise you, we all come to appreciate it one day. Eventually. Hopefully. (If you haven’t you better!)
Mine will remain a mystery while yours a fairy tale
Wooden Loft Ladders – The Fundamentals One Should Know Before You Pay For One
Once Martin and Zimmerman came into contact, did Zimmerman first physically attack Martin or did Martin first physically attack Zimmerman?
There are a handful of us on earth (keeping in mind, when you live on a planet of 7 billion people, even a handful is a lot!) who have been hmmmm I really am not sure what the right word would be to discribe this added set of DNA material that we have. So I will just tell you what I had seen in my meditation yesterday and how I arrived at this understanding.
Lesson: when one is wrong – tell him, and not only him, tell the group that was following the example. Here we have the disadvantage of the MSP which amplifies this tactic from the opposing viewpoint. If the tactic works for them and is described in the Bible to be used on those who are doing wrong, let’s turn up the volume on this a bit. I have already written one of my senators on the travesty McRino assisted in foisting. Let’s just say, I’m in Texas. I haven’t forgotten Waco.
Shag was running around and snapping at a small fly that was dancing through the air.
There will be some who will argue that running from your attacker is safer and less likely to end in injury to you or your attacker. This may be true up to a point; however, I would argue that being required to flee also has its drawbacks. First, fleeing could make you even more vulnerable, particularly, if your efforts fail and your attacker is able to catch you now off guard. Second, attempting to flee may only embolden your attacker and may cause him to ramp up his attack. Third, just like bullies, many criminals are cowards and you may be better able to prevent the crime and protect yourself with a show of strength and resistance. Fourth, and most importantly to me, since we all have an interest in and benefit from stopping crime, I simply find it objectionable and counterproductive for a society to require its law abiding citizens to retreat from criminals. Finally, I am little persuaded by any desire to spare injury to the attacker. It should be noted that the law in question does not require you to fight back. It simply supports your right to do so if you reasonably believe that you can prevent the crime.
plotting
Most years this occurs during June around here, but a mild spring will invoke earlier invasions, and of course the aphids have been in your trees, feeding and reproducing for a few weeks before the damage is evident.
I just need a break, just me and my dog, just need to get my whistle wet.
words will ring within your being,
Chris Arendt is a papermaker, paper artist and veteran who served part of his term in the Army at Guantanamo Bay. He also spent 15 months, the length of a modern Army deployment, collecting stories as a homeless veteran.
As a Jesuit—and a Saint, into the bargain.
I’m pretty sure the girl was freaked out as much as Equestrian. She was tripping over herself to run out of the room. It doesn’t quite end there.
Last weekend was my cousin's wedding reception. Most of the family was there and we had a blast...
MEYERTON: Shaidy Trickett (7) wounded by armed black robbers.
The elite present white women as only worth one thing. In early August 2007 on a Big Brother programme, within 5 minutes of arriving in the house, the role model for young white women was announcing that she loved to "swallow" and performing a lap dance for two people she'd only just met. Around the same time I accidentally turned on Hollyoaks at 5.15 and was greeted with two blokes snogging, tongues and all.
Larger businesses and organizations and celebrities have public relations departments or agents who are responsible for getting word out to the media. Most of us can't afford this, but that doesn't mean we aren't newsworthy.
The beachside wedding decor looks absolutely beautiful... and I cannot wait to reveal all the gorgeous details this fall, when Martha Stewart Weddings destination issue hits newsstands.Yesterday was Liz and Colin's wedding rehearsal, led by Darcy Miller, editorial director of Martha Stewart Weddings. Since most of us aren't lucky enough to have Darcy map out our ceremony details, I sat down with her after the rehearsal to learn how to organize an expertly planned practice session... Here are a few of Darcy's tips, along with some fun images from Liz and Colin's rehearsal.
As of today, McKeown and Faulkner still tour playing the Rollers hits but due to legal reasons, they are unable to use the Bay City Rollers name.
And that is a victory testimony, isn't it?
This morning we went out and found a tiny whistling tree frog, AJ wanted to keep it but I said he would miss his frog friends and that I would take a photo for him to keep. AJ is learning that friends come in all shapes and sizes and some are with you for a long time and others just a moment.
Sin sinks! I repeat: Sin is a sinker! Don’t allow it. Only fools make a mockery of sin! (Proverbs 14:9) Sin sunk Samson! It sunk Gehazi. It killed Achan. Run for your life!
These are two of the "California" things
It’s so beautiful, so delicate but so throbbing. I will make the bold statement and say: This is one of the only shoujo animes/mangas I’ve come across that is actually good.
Japanese people hate litter.
A guy wouldn’t go shop for stupid shit with you unless he really wanted to spend time with you would he? I don’t get it, but I’m giving it time because realistically that’s all I can do.
If in some smothering dreams you too could pace
(*if he spends what he has on foolish things)
I don't know how anybody lives in New York. I mean I love it there but I am always so exhausted after I leave. Days start with 8am meetings then chug along until 6pm. Work is followed by cocktails which are followed by a late dinner (usually at a different venue and possibly a different group of people) which is followed by more cocktails and potentially dancing. Here I am with one of my absolutely favorite editors, Ms. Julee Wilson from Real Simple, at Dos Caminos. Post drinks and dinner. Pre-rooftop drinks at Le Bain (apparently THE place to be and be seen) and dancing at Griffin until 4:30am. I guess it's like Diddy says, "You've got to be the last one in the club and the first in the office" or something like that. That's an awful paraphrase but you get what I'm saying.
Finish: Long, with malt, sherry, flambéed banana and then lots of ashy dryness from the various charred flavours on the palate.
“Actually, I’m glad you came, Whippy,” replied Sir Paul. “Sometimes it takes a view from an outsider to make you realise what’s going wrong in your life.”
“…stinging…”.
Anyone who follows Roland Martin on Twitter know that he can get under your skin. Especially if you are a fan of the Dallas Cowboys, anyone Republican or if you are a member of any black fraternity besides Alpha Phi Alpha. He also is an annoying advocate of any team from Houston and Texas A & M. He is a master at what is called in black culture of “playing the dozens” or “jonein.”
I see him here next to me. He is a big man. Just like Dillon, his dog, was a big dog. Now thin and resting happily and peacefully in front of me on the floor. Dillon is a master at resting now. The last time I saw John he too had become slight. I hear his voice, particularly, a thin husk. A husk that had held a large boisterous voice, often laughing.
We have a winner for last weeks sponsored challenge and we have also chosen our Top 5... here they are:
“Yeah, you did, Larry,” Dzinski said, drumming his fingers on the dark wood counter. “I just like to see things with my own eyes. Force of habit, you know.”
Not only do many wounded souls survive an abusive childhood at the hands of an unhealthy and merciless father, but then to feel that once they reach adulthood and escape that upbringing — they are never truly free because they have to bear out in their lives the curse of the sins of their father?
Planting flower baskets (for the porch)
I liked this book. I didn’t love this book. And, I don’t think I liked it enough to read it again. I became weary of the many conversations analysing every new piece of evidence: Blomkvist mentions it to Cortez and Eriksson, and then has to tell Figuerola who then must discuss it with her boss and so on. Each time a piece of information is revealed it is mulled over, looked at in a different way, from a different angle…I would skip over entire paragraphs and pages because the content did not change and I found myself not really caring about each character’s opinion.
Him: Ok, do you need any percocet while I'm there?
Feeling sure that what they sought was still ahead of them, the party arrived at the edge of the water. All was dark now that the staff had been removed. Elysia cast Fly and transported herself and Ferros across to the far side. They began their search of the cells where the demons had been imprisoned. There were huge scratches in the stone of the cells, marks of the frustration and anger that the demons had experienced during their centuries of imprisonment but no obvious signs of secret doors. Ferros’ Locate Object spell was still running, and he began to sense that it was nearby. Using triangulation, he pinpointed it about fifteen feet beyond the wall of the most left-hand cell. The wall seemed very solid indeed and it was likely that there was some other route to its location.
And I have lots and lots of these -- random sheets of paper with notes, thoughts, ideas, diagrams, etc.
"Mystery is a woman's greatest charm," Dietrich famously said. She embodied that. Like Bardot and Garbo, she became reclusive once her looks could no longer be maintained or the maintenance become a bother. They were perhaps the first three true artists of the anima persona. They sacrificed a normal later life so their anima cachet could resonate forever as the true vampires of our century; the anima of the movie siphoning the energy of our desire until we fall back, weakened by masochistic reverie, romantic memories dredged up from our dating history and absorbed into the celluloid of the vampire anima, lighting up her skin in that Von Sternberg latticework shadow 'lectricity. In witholding herself from her image, our inner projection of the anima finds its focus for the first time, like a dead ship igniting into windswept sails and mizzenmast hoisting.
Why is the establishment so desperate to silence the voices calling out against mass immigration and for the fair treatment of the native British population?, why do they try and portray BNP voters and members as hate filled, jackbooted, fascists when a single visit to the BNP's website shows that could not be farther than the truth?
HALP!
The birthday girl and flapper instigator is American and a good while back the two of us were in a specialist sweet shop in town, which was stacked to the rafters with American goodies. At the time I remarked at how in films or sitcoms people always seem to eat pop-tarts for breakfast and that I had no idea what they were and that I was curious what the whole hype was about. Sadly the shop only sold ones that my friend didn’t approve of declaring that if I was going to try them they had to be the right kind: frosted strawberry.
Of course, I can't complete a review of Levine's book without remarking on its own "Eustace" moment. No, thankfully its not Judith herself, but a man called Richard whom she visits. Richard, we learn from Levine's charming description, "personally produces a cubic yard of shit a year" (p. 155). Bear in mind we are smashed in the face with this anecdote just two pages after the man is introduced. Clearly, a measurement of one's "output" has become one of the must-know stats about a person.
adding up to over 2,100 sq. ft.
There have been critical nuclear attacks against underground cities and sub-shuttle systems.
On floats the wind over the breast of the sea setting in toward land,
MR: Tell us about your lyrics.
The consuming requirements of my dad’s illness have been creating a growing frustration. Obligations to him always seem to come at the worst moment, forcing me to push aside my own family’s needs. My dad, who was always a delightful person, has become an enormous inconvenience. And as his disease marches forward, it’s only going to get worse.
But that sixth straight divisional title won’t come easy, for the NL East has become vastly improved over the last few years. It might not rival its American League counterpart for pure firepower, but each team has a much more solid nucleus than even five years ago. Until Arte Moreno opened up his piggy bank, the Marlins were the clear superstars of the winter meetings, inking Mark Buerhle, Jose Reyes and Heath Bell to extravagant contracts, a win now mentality taking the organization in its grasp. Realistically, you could poke quite a few holes in the Miami dream of a championship in the first year of their newly christened electronic pleasuredome..I mean, stadium. Closers have a notoriously short lifespan, and for all of his recent success, Bell is 34 and the owner of a K/BB ratio that took a sharp plunge last year (a fairly reliable precursor for decline.) The Reyes story (all-world talent, fragile body) is well-known. Ace Josh Johnson is returning from a long injury layoff. And of yeah, there’s that pesky situation with budding malcontent Hanley Ramirez and his plummeting OPS and initial grumbling about switching to third base to accommodate Reyes. But the Marlins also have breakout star-in-the-making Giancarlo Stanton and his otherworldy power to anchor the lineup. And for my money, Buerhle is the best signing they made all offseason. He’s proven himself as a reliable innings eater in the brutal American League, and even though his days of touching twenty wins are receding, he’s still a valuable veteran presence on a young club. There’s enough volatile energy in South Beach
lost myself in the words
“It’s really a wonder that I haven’t dropped all my ideals, because they seem so absurd and impossible to carry out. Yet I keep them, because in spite of everything I still believe that people are really good at heart.”
Janice: Queen of the Waves won’t release until spring 2013, so I’ve spent most of my time promoting the other ladies’ books. And I’ll be honest—we’re not really promoting the books. We’re just having fun aboard the Titanic. The “experience” is the vehicle for sales. People are purchasing books because they’re enjoying themselves as they take on the various role(s) from history. And never underestimate the power of an excited reader. The 200 folks aboard this cruise are telling others, who are telling others. . .
What really bothered them about Jesus was the way He sought out “unclean” people—those with diseases, those with clear and unmistakable sin in their lives. Wasn’t He forfeiting His personal purity by associating with lowly individuals? It seemed an outrage! Yet Jesus led history’s holiest life even while seeking out those who needed to see and touch true purity. And in Him, they touched it. Perhaps one of the great secrets of holiness is that it can’t be hoarded.
"In fact I was lying here naked one day, a young lady in attendance, when my next-door neighbour, the chairman of the Rural District Council, popped his head over yonder hedge to inform me that I had Dutch Elm Disease.
And then reality sets in. My ‘lucky’ numbers were so pathetically absent in the big drawing that I was embarrassed! How could I have been so off—even with quick picks (where the computer picks the numbers for you)—heck, I hardly had ANY numbers that matched the six winning numbers. Yes, it means back to work, and back to writing MOJOs. Actually, I did tell myself that IF I won big, I would continue to write Mojos, and my notoriety would bring more readers. Keep dreaming….
Double Double check every call, you will be added to ensure that any accurate readings
Hey everyone, I received a lot of great feedback on this post last week and really wanted to continue making an effort to talk more about my life. Well most of you may or may not know that Mr. Charming isn't Little One's biological father. I consider him her father completely though. I mean she does call him "Dada!" which makes me so happy! Anywho I'm going to share with you a little about my relationship with her "father" a couple years ago in hopes to help any other girls.
I will rise to my feet. Your dominance and shackles will fall away. I will stand tall. I will remember who I am. Free from this corruption, this perversion of me. No more.
Deeper and higher.
Bright and early on Thursday, May 26th (before the sun had even come up), I began my journey to Florida. Now the totally wierd thing is that in my 21+ years of motherhood, I have NEVER left my kids for more than three or four days at a time. Oh, they have left me...for visits with their grandparents, church camp, and, in more recent years, trips to visit friends...but I have never been the one to leave except for brief weekend trips. So, for me to be going on a long extended trip by myself just seemed SO wierd. However, wierd or not, me alone was the plan.
Gregory: they do?
barefooted and climbing the dunes...
we kept asking for lines
Fresh Calamari julienned, Pan Grilled With
and makeshift human cages.
"That poor woman's dead."
Stamps: Pun Fun
Bullcrap! I say.
That's Kay and I hamming it up before our first shoot together! I did eight photo shoots altogether. One with Brittany at 8am (yes that early) and the rest from about 12ish to 10pm!!!! We were all zombies when we finished!!! But it was soooooooooooooooooo much fun!!!!!﻿
I can't get over how tall my coneflower is this year! It's so pretty, and obviously VERY happy where it is!
Feel free to leave a comment with your tips on writing sex scenes. But please . . . omit any reference to your sister.
The Vaccine and Abortion Racket
Third: (tie) Black Sunday/Ronin
Weekend here you come and i can't wait for the visit!
My husband gave me that name :) because I love food so much just like her (Julia Child), and I love to make something new which I do not like to stick to traditional food. So why not try and put some different flavors together, to give a new flavor which I can enjoy (not always ;) :D but it is good to try) My husband is also like hers, he always encourages me when it comes to my ambitions, even when he is not interested in that thing I wish to do, except for cooking, it is within his circle of interests, he is the one who is going to eat that food, as he likes to put some of his cooking touches sometimes (they are usually such wonderful touches).
Where does the time get to?
"The Opera Box"
Brandon Alvendia
1:01 a.m. (Ach, the stalling.) I'm goin' in.
My T levels are good
I can't tell you how long I've sat on the bed just starring at him. Thinking how sweet and tender his heart is. Thanking God for my Philip-- exactly the way he is.
- Attend the University of Brighton placements fair
So that’s the Arab sheikhs. As for the Hindu Sikhs (Christy Moore seemed to mix together two major Indian religions) I wonder how our new Minister for Transport, Tourism and Sport, Leo Varadker got on, during his St Patrick’s Day junket to India, home of his father. Might we see some hitherto absent investment from the world’s biggest democracy?
I follow a blog, The Feminist Breeder, authored by Gina Crosley-Corcoran. Gina is a rock chick turned passionate breastfeeding/natural birth advocate. Gina is very intelligent, witty, honest and brave. She is exactly my type of cool feminist rock-chick baby mama. Yet too often we can read between the lines her weariness at having her OPINIONS savagely and ignorantly attacked by the haters.
John Miller was an English printer who immigrated to South Carolina in 1783. Prior to arriving in the colonies John Miller had created quite a reputation London as being a bit outspoken regarding many topics including the government, and of course, he supported a free press. He was brought to trial several times regarding items
The guy who had sold him his last rock had offered him enough goodies to last him a week for an hour with the girl. At the time he was too busy trying to get the poison in his veins to consider it, but now. Now he did consider it, his mind latched on to the idea like a drowning man clutching a life preserver. He didn’t know why he hadn’t thought of it before. He wouldn’t have to bother kissing up to some grease peddler with over processed hair any more. He could sit back and relax and let the little tramp earn her keep. It was perfect, all he had to do now was find her.
But as everyone knows ,
I can’t wait to fill those frames with some baby pictures!I really wanted to keep the room gender neutral. This is why I went for the light mint walls with white and silver accents. Also, I didn’t want it to be too cliché baby themed.
I won’t dispute that several contestants used addons or out of game viewers throughout the contest and I really am happy to have encouraged them to do so. As competitor comments here will tell you, this contest would have failed or been completely different if people had to build the outfit. I would like to see the results of an event like WoW Factor where contestants are told to make an outfit and have less than a week to do it. It becomes limited to those who have a bank of gear selection, gold, time, and RNG luck. The end result would still have some incredible outfits, but the overall quality wouldn’t be nearly the same because of the previously mentioned mitigating factors. I admit it also wouldn’t be worth trying and why at the end of the day WoW Factor and Mog Madness are two completely different events/contests. The segment in their show even ends loosely on that conclusion.
So to add that extra unique touch, and to have a cleanly finished center front, I took the extra couple of inches of bias tape I had left over and pinned it down the center front outside of my bra with the ends folded under at the top and bottom and overlapping to the inside by about 1/2".
My next stop was the hotel, restaurant and café Centrum. I opted for the cosy café, which seemed to be the very best in the village with a decent beer list, including Girardin oude lambik and kriekenlambik, and well worthy of a full entry in Tim Webb's Good Beer Guide. I had previously tasted jonge lambik from Girardin at the excellent restaurant De Rare Vos in Schepdaal. It had an interesting leather-like aroma with a touch of toffee. The flavours were surprisingly harmonious with sweet toffee flavours, hints of dry wood and refreshing citrus. The oude lambik, having spent up to three years in the barrel, was very different. Still slightly unattractive in appearance with just a few bubbles gracing the surface. Now raisins and vanilla reached for the nose, and in the mouth the winous liquid revealed lemons, wood and not least vanilla. Two highly different, but wonderful beers in themselves; blending them makes the world's best geuze in my opinion.
The Journals of Canaan Quintanilla Will Continue…
- The city’s drive to plant as many street trees as possible has had the unintended consequence of making people’s allergies worse during high pollen counts. Brooklyn Eagle
As a Professional Treasure Hunter I can understand the recovery of a body being deemed a Treasure.
You can find them either by clicking on ‘Intermediate 2′ at the top of the page for all 3, or choose a unit from the drop down menu and it will be at the top of the page for that unit.
- Allagash Hugh Malone
How it works:
Without going into specifics for reasons of privacy and also covering my butt, my fantastic co-worker and I came up with the idea of having a Tooth Brushing Club here in our classroom. Why you ask? Here is the non-specific butt covering reason:
“It’s a very bad precedent for the aldermen,” said Greazzo.
works with Orbit Baby Sidekick Stroller Board, Color Packs, Stroller Travel Bag, Green Edition Footmuff (sizes Small and Large), Weather Pack (size Large), and Stroller Panniers
All the photos on James Radke Photography site are the exclusive copyright of James Radke, all rights reserved.
Everybody! There is no age or sex restriction for this!
snow in the forecast...
Hardcover
The price you pay for reading this blog is that every now and then I go off the rails and write about things I have no right to write. Right?
John James Badagliacca, 35, New York, N.Y.
He touched her shoulder. “I understand but what we need to discuss is important.”
“What is happening in South Africa against the white population is a crime against humanity. Savage. And no one will speak of it. The leftist media (all big media) and the international community (notoriously left-leaning) ignore it entirely. Their silence is affirmation; it sanctions the evil. Most decent people are perplexed by the uneven humanity and inhumanity of our leftist moral "superiors." I am not. They unremittingly vilify the Jewish people and Israel, the most benevolent government and army in the Middle East, but pay scant attention to jihad and the Islamic culture of honor killings, clitorectomies, child slavery, forced marriage, child marriage, etc. Why? Because the leftists are bigots and racists, that's why. Because as morally superior as they think they are, they have no regard for their own side's perpetrators of violence, like the black South Africans. Their subliminal message is clear: "They're animals, whaddaya expect?" That is their prejudice. It's the soft bigotry of low expectations. The genocide of white South Africans? Yawn. Whaddaya expect?” Pamela Geller, American Thinker, April 2010
The same goes for a horse with your football teams name, the name of your first dog or the name of your ex best friends, cousins, second girlfriend that he fingered in the park that one time. (Um, too much?) None of these flashes of recognition are going to make your horse any faster and be a dead cert in the 2.40. Sorry about that.
Painting the body of the car took some children VERY little time to complete, so I also provided some blank paper for them to paint an extra picture of their choice if they wanted to, just to keep them busy at the art center until the rest of the groups were done with their activity. The volunteer at the art center had to put their names on the bottoms of the cartons with a permanent marker.
the Slice of Life
A few days later I was curious enough to Google it. I typed "cloudy urine" and immediately got upset. I didn't bother reading the results, I changed the search to "urine protein". The first result listed the possible causes and there it was "Multiple Myeloma". I laughed nervously. I know that I block unpleasant things, but this was ridiculous. I knew somewhere deep down what it was all along. I just didn't want to know it.
George Mountford Adie & Joseph Azize; Cambridge: Lighthouse Editions, 2007.
tomorrow i return with the full writeup and thoughts around my brand timeline.
My friend Bonnie recently asked me to make a cake for her husband's 40th birthday dinner, and I was excited because I hadn't seen her in years! Among the things that she mentioned about her husband included his love for golf, as well as cherries jubilee ice cream. So I decided to make a chocolate cake filled with cherries jubilee whipped cream filling.
This dish is a heart-healthy chicken dish that is low in calories, fat and cholesterol. Serve the stew piping hot over orzo or pasta with a tossed green salad on the side. The bonus is that Chicken Kapama can be made a day ahead and will taste as good, if not better. Just be sure to have some crusty bread on the side to sop up all the sauce!
There are some genetically inherited things which attract our attention like eyes looking at us. Our automatic reflexes determine our actions if those eyes are perceived as predatory. We are very attuned to eyes and from them we are able to intuitively recognize the emotional state behind them and act accordingly. So we naturally pay attention to eyes which are intense and goal oriented. When watching TV we watch the actors’ eyes and beginning actors are trained to stare intently into their opposite actors’ eyes while saying their lines. This rigid staring becomes obvious and odious once you notice the actors doing it. A more natural form is to vary the attention and the direction of the eyes depending upon what is being said and heard.
Unknown (1 albumen, 1870)
Under existing US law and numerous precedents, the Palestinian Authority should have had its US funding yanked a long time ago.
"The Bat-Man" appeared in a six-page story that also introduced the character of Commissioner Gordon. The second-to-last panel revealed that this mysterious figure was in fact Bruce Wayne, introduced earlier in the story."
When I get a chance I'll load some new pictures.....but the boys have been busy playing and being cute of course ;).
Buy Classic and Neutral
Mr. Crawford told Elections Canada he overheard a conversation in which Mr. Sona “was describing ‘how the Americans do politics,’ using the examples of calling non-supporters late at night, pretending to be Liberals, or calling electors to tell them that their poll location had changed.”
Beers available include Hawkshead's own Cumbrian 5 Hop and their new brew, New Zealand Pale Ale. I'm also really keen to get my first taste of a new brewery that seem to have set the twitter tongues wagging recently. The brewery in question is Magic Rock Brewing Co and despite being in their infancy, they seem to have caught the eye with their hoptastic beers such as their 9.2 % Human Cannonball and their High Wire and Rapture. Here's hoping they live up to what others are saying about them.
a cool, blue-based white will pull out the orange tones.
This desk was built my father. A piece of wood oddly similar to the size and shape of a door that has been coated in a silver lacquer, and placed on two giant Sansui speakers. To my right is a RX-6010V Audio/Video Control Receiver. I have no real clear idea as to what all of the buttons on this contraption can do, but when the source name is on CD and a plug is hooked in my laptop, beautiful music comes out near my feet. It echoes throughout this small room of mine, and rings around the basement. To my left is a clustering of random objects: a cell phone, wrist watch, mechanical pencil, headphones (oddly reminiscent of Princess Leia), another set of headphones (oddly normal looking in comparison of the other ones), a Pre-Calculus book, bow-tie, Nintendo DS, a microphone, car keys, and a copy of Cold Mountain. In front of me sits my Dell laptop. It is blue, the same color as the walls in a newly born baby boys’ room.
I don’t know anybody in all the world who is so hated as Jesus Christ. No one curses anyone as much as they curse Jesus. There is no villain in history brought up so often, or with so much scorn, mocked so much, or so vehemently protested as the person who laid down His life for the sins of others, the person who bled out for those He wanted to forgive.
Princes want hot girls. And hot girls get the fairy tales.
I suspect if you live in much of the Borders, Highlands (and some Islands), Yorkshire, Lincolnshire or East Anglia. you may be amongst us. Ooh, and Wales too. If you can't see the sea from where you live in Wales, you're buggered.
Sign up for my Email Feed (2 Entries)
St Louis was quite impressive. I liked it. As a matter of fact, I woke up there this morning, and we drove back just now.
My daughter’s name is Brinea (Bree nay uh). She did not live to grow up in the physical world, however, she is with God. I also played a big role in my niece’s life from age 3 to 8. She’s now 14…OMG!
I must confess, my head is miles from Millbrook. I've spent the past week and a half soaking up sun in southern Florida after making flowers for a party in West Palm Beach hosted by the very same bride who brought us to Millbrook in the first place. But again we will suspend time and space to have a bit of fall dreaming.
‘You know, you wouldn’t feel so out of place if you put on some clothes,’ said Judy when I happened to mention this incident over our smoothie-maker a few minutes later. ‘Lord knows what the neighbours think when they look out to see you bending down to pick up the milk.’
I never knew my great-grandmother on her side, in fact not even my mom did - she passed away in 1954, not long after after my mother was born.
7Behold, I come quickly: blessed is he that keepeth the sayings of the prophecy of this book.
This is a hard equation for some people to handle…
A straw poll on Twitter revealed that many Linkedin members rarely engage with the service. One user said: “All I do on it is accept link requests, besides that nothing!” A student said “Lecturers recommended we set one up” but added “I’ve only added friends to my Linkedin.”
Over the next years, the Khmer Rouge killed many intellectuals, city-dwellers, minority people, and many of their own party members and soldiers who were suspected of being traitors
This has been an AMAZING journey for me! I started the challenge WAY back on Sept 9, 2008. We started with myself and three DT members. And it slowly grew into this beautiful creature of art inspiring art and I became known as "The EtsyInspired Girl." EtsyInspired is truly like one of my babies, I've nurtured it and watched it grow. I've made giant leaps and huge mistakes. And I poured my heart into in. Every single person who has ever played this challenge is so very dear to me. I appreciate that you have taken the time out of your life to come let the shops we've chosen inspire you. EtsyInspired was a dream come true for me on so many levels and I thank all my DT members, Etsy shops, sponsors, and players for coming with me on this journey.
TEVA campers go on a 3-4 night trip when they’re at camp. CITs are gone for 5-8 nights on a canoe or backpacking trip. The sense of self-confidence and accomplishment these leadership campers gain while on this trips is clearly evident when they get back into camp. And the close-knit feeling of the group is a bond that can’t be broken- ask any of the TEVAs and CITs you know!!
This is Erin, who is an HIV/AIDS case manager from Muskegon, Michigan and is unpublished:
That'd never been touched
The Boers are considered to be an indigenous group as they were formed on African soil from diverse national origins as a distinctive national group.
And tears are a language God understands.
And while the blame game gets underway, the fact remains that no amount of denials or “passing the buck” is going to help the prime minister and his team.
Do you believe that everything happens for a reason? I guess I'm somewhere in between the God as puppet master in the sky and everything is random. I understand the attraction to the notion that everything is part of a larger plan - that all things have purpose. It makes hard things make more sense than if they were just things that happened for no apparent reason. But the trick to that is, that then you must believe in a God that does bad things to people for some unidentifiable and mysterious purpose. And even if it is supposedly for "our own good", that's really hard for me to swallow. I might buy the God as parent rationale for that except that that's pretty limited. There are some things parents just don't do - even for teaching or disciplinary purposes. And I don't think God does them either. I think that God can work through bad things for our good, and that she does - but not that she causes bad things to happen. And I do believe that there are things that God does, in working in and through our lives that we aren't meant to understand.
Readers enjoyed it. Encouraged me. And from doing this challenge, I am now working on their story, NEVERLOVE. Talk about a birth of a novel!!
31. V. Tristan und Isolde, i, verses 5-8.
Happy knackered.
The couple sat at the other end of the dining area in the pub. He had a flamboyant moustache, all slick and oiled to match his hair. She was rejecting plump for overweight and had a round plain face, peroxide blonde hair and a white wool coat. She removed this as they sat down. He ordered his meal and then decided for her. ‘And My Lady will have…’ he said as she donned her coat and sashayed outside (really) for a fag. On her return she slipped out of the coat and dragged it behind her, trailing it across the floor. I’m sure I’ve
By: BettyConfidential (View Profile)
I was introduced to this blog and her take on writing a good book description. I think it’s the best breakdown I’ve seen so far:
For neighbours always knew
9. Dual Enrollment is offered in most places as an option for older students who prove through testing that they are capable of completing college-level coursework. The students are then allowed to enroll for FREE in certain college courses while they complete their Junior and Senior years of high school, and the work counts toward college AND high school credit, so in the end you save on tuition and finish an associates or undergrad degree much more quickly than the average student.
Outside a classic Swedish country-house, on a small island about one hour’s drive from Stockholm, a crowd of thousands of people gather from all over Sweden, Europe and even people flying in from other lands – all of them enduring the cold and the agonizing wait, in anticipation of the first ABBA reunion concert since the early 1980s when the group last performed together.
Sitting trot has caused some fillings to be loosened in lower molars.
I’ve also been encouraged to review each day’s positives, just before going to sleep…now, I find that a bit difficult…usually I’ve had enough of the day by then and just want to go to sleep…but I’m giving this idea a try. Perhaps that’s a bit like a “thankfulness” or “gratitude” practice…but might include a broader range of positives. Here is a link to some really good and helpful books about Gratitude by author MJ Ryan: Gratitude Books
abv: 5.6% ibu’s: 56
that believes there is a
After, Nicole & her boyfriend Simon came with me to Richard's house to meet up with Laura & Richie & Mike. I broke a statue's head off by accident. Cue mortification. Cue pacifying by Richie.
So. You get the benefit of learning something new, and I’ve discovered a new toy for the blog. I’d say that’s a Win-Win!
Another long day at work done. WOO HOO.
Cool on a wire rack and store in an airtight container. These can be stored for up to 3 days. (I promise, they won't last that long).
A printable recipe card follows.
These calculations assume that the borrower makes a down payment of 20 percent or more. If the down payment is less than 20 percent, the borrower must pay for mortgage insurance, and the premiums are higher on the 30-year loan.
As I discovered on my trip to the UK last year, there are cogs and then there are other cogs.
This is our lovely front door. (that needs painting)
A question raised by this prestigious overseas education, worth a total of almost $600,000 at today’s prices, is how it was paid for. Friends said that they didn’t know, though one suggested that Mr. Bo’s mother paid with the earnings of her legal career. Her law firm declined to comment.
And we can either ignore their intolerance or speak up in favor of diversity and acceptance.
It was a rarity that Elizabeth Edwards was not at the side of her husband. Her medical issues aside, it was clear that her goal matched his for pursuing the ultimate prize. Smart, savvy and well received by the MSM, she was his biggest cheerleader and her popularity was as instrumental in his appearances as they joined together to present a portrait of that “perfect family” the public preferred.
The first option, with all those ingredients we cannot pronounce is Cheese Whiz. And I am sure you already guessed that the second option is peanut butter (the simple one liner ingredient list must have given it away). At first glance the nutritional value of Cheese Whiz looks better, but do not be fooled by processed and chemical induced ‘nutritionally valuable’ choices. Aim for pure ingredients, even if it has a little more fat than the fake fillers!
I had already considered going solo. I think that if you are a songwriter you are at least bound to think about it.
A few news items to note:
Also, I should note while I’m on the topic of cost, that others have reported successfully using FSA (Flexible Spending Account) dollars for the non-food part of the program cost (as medically related), so that’s good news. And some people can apparently deduct it as medical expenses when itemizing for taxes.
She’s amazing and is going to do more justice to that quilt than I ever could. She’s a magician with machine quilting. Can’t wait to get it back and finish up the pattern for you all to enjoy!!
Besides those Christmastime visits to Ruth’s Chris which we still, by the way, treat ourselves to every season, I particularly look forward to steak this time of year. Grilling a steak is my favorite way to prepare it. Whether it’s a t-bone, strip or hanger steak nothing takes to the flavor that charcoal imparts better. I prefer mine medium rare, but I’m very accommodating. I’ll prepare yours anyone way you like. Nothing elaborate, mind you. A simple sprinkling of salt and freshly ground pepper and you’re ready to go with it.
CONCLUSION: It was still funny and charming however.
Serve it in big slices, like a lasagne. This is a complete meal in itself, with veggies, protein and carbs all together. But it's good to have something else alongside for variety. That could be a nice crisp salad, or any side vegetable, or even a sausage for the meat-eaters, or a slice of smoked salmon - that's especially good if you've gone for lemon and dill as your flavours.
And also mother
And stay tuned...because I have some other amazing uses for things in your pantry coming up soon!!!
We recently read an article in the Sudan Tribune about delegates from the church in South Sudan wanting to take gifts and offerings to Jerusalem in keeping with prophecy in Isaiah 18 (referring to the people of Cush):
For Hosoe, photography has always been a forum for autobiography. Evacuation from his native Tokyo to the countryside during World War II helped make him a wanderer; the destruction of Nagasaki and Hiroshima helped make him a lonely wanderer. Factor in rebellions against his father, a Buddhist priest, and conservative Japanese photography, and it becomes clear why he's such a theatrical humanitarian.
Xhaferri was in Pristina on Thursday to meet with Kosovo’s Prime Minister Hashim Thaci, and the Foreign Minister Enver Hoxhaj.
New Church
Triglycerides: 518
Pick 1: Colts
How powerful is our faith! How powerful is our family history! How powerful are God’s promises and gifts to our future! The birth of Jesus was the only gift I’ll ever need in this lifetime, and I received it, because of God’s grace. Not only that, but Abraham is our father in God’s sight as it also says, “God who gives life to the dead and calls into being things that were not”. God calls things to exist that were not beforehand. We may know that on the surface, but do we ever ponder it deep down?
6. Grand Bazaar – Istanbul, Turkey
I loved getting to know Cat’s team. The men are rough and tough and it was interesting to see them at a point where Cat had a new member. It showed the testaments she needed to make to gain trust from the men, but also assured the reader that she was accepted as their leader as well as a friend. Watching the final team member slowly integrate and trust Cat was almost like watching a relationship develop…Gave you the new relationship feeling that was missing from Cat and Bones. Mostly because Cat and Bones aren’t new.
The debate focused on the situation following the Arab Spring, amidst reports that minorities have been left worse off following the revolutions throughout the region.
Ramen Yamadaya is one such place, that I can hit up on my way home from work. They slow cook their tonkotsu broth - breaking down the essence in pork bones - for 20 hours - something I would never have time to do at home - and would certainly never be able to do as well as them!
A while ago I told you about a new project, well, here it is. 'I used to live here' documents the last 3 years of my life and the places where I have lived.
BAM: The Complete Works (Quantuck Lane Press) is a 384-page tome containing close to 400 photographs and essays by 31 writers, most of them artists who have graced BAM’s stage.
- The best things in life are online.
Hot Pepper Ratatouille
Developed off a concept by the Duchess of Northumberland - the owner of the real Poison Gardens - the story is based around young Jessamine Luxton, the daughter of an eccentric village apothecary. Since she was a child, she's known of her father's mysterious garden of poisonous plants; what he sees as a possible boon for humanity, a gift of healing just waiting to be harnessed. Like Mary Lennox from The Secret Garden, Jessamine's constant desire is to be able to join her father beyond the locked gate and join him with the plants that she is only allowed to care for as seedlings.
Thank goodness for photography. I just love these pictures so much.
People who play a leadership role in any community are normally the ones who are also bombarded with curious questions and pleas for advice and guidance. If their answers or advice is proven wrong or inaccurate, then it can be naturally assumed that their leadership-status among the community would be at risk. The ancient Astronomers therefore had an obligation to their community to seek and find answers, not in dreams or subconscious feelings as is the case with Astrology, but in nature and real objects that were visible to the naked eye.
If your lawn is typical in size and you want a low upkeep remedy to lawn care, a cordless electric mower will be an effective selection to consider.
Please give me tips of how to make my roses stay alive!!! I don't want to be labeled as a "killer."
This is at the elementary level, but when a "school of choice" opened in our district this year, virtually every white student in my daughter's grade left to go to that school, which billed itself as a progressive alternative to zoned schools. Now Brooklyn New School might open a new school in district 13, which will definitely impede the integration of local zoned schools which have already lost many white, biracial, and affluent families to BNS.
Some of the topics that will be addressed include:
4. Slow walkers
even more, i don't have time to READ my favorite blogs. unless i get them in e-mail, because then i can read them laying in bed, with one eye open, off of my phone, when i am trying to fall back asleep after futilely convincing my almost 10 month old that playing in her room at 4am is NOT appropriate.
Well, if you don't know, how on earth can I help you? What's your job? What are the job offers? Do you have to move? Would you make more money? Would you have more time or less time for your family life? Is where you work now a horrible sinful place where you are surrounded by evil? Are your co-workers dragging you into a life of sin? Are you put upon so much so that you feel used and abused? Is there health insurance?
A minute later I received an SMS from Etisalat, not, as I’d hoped, to inform me that the service has been renewed, but to proffer me a complaint number. It was fine, though. It was a development. I’m now armed with a complaint number; an important reinforcement in the bureaucratic battle of getting my complaint on the record.
Many people associate planning and budgeting with being an annoying chore but PowerWallet, the safest and easiest online money management tool, will forever change your outlook about managing your finances. With PowerWallet, you will stop looking at budgeting as a hassle and more as a planning process that is easy and fun. The President of PowerWallet, Bob Sullivan, has one simple yet genius philosophy — “Not everyone likes to budget, but everyone needs a plan.”
As I said before, I am not so strict when it comes to food combining. I enjoy eating a banana with my morning grains, I like butternut squash and chickpea soup, and I love raw brownies! You should see my breakfast smoothies: I jam just about anything edible into that blender and whizz it up, without batting an eyelash. Fruits, veggies, nut milk, algae, chlorophyll, bee pollen, avocado, flax oil, …basically something from every single food group because I still have a hard time wrapping my head around the fact that it won’t digest properly – I’ve been taught for so long to eat as much good stuff as possible! Doesn’t that mean all in one go? Argh. I too struggle with being a more health-conscious individual.
This isn't a synopsis either, it's the set up for the story.
32. Photo apps - especially instagram.
“We can’t get rid of every bird in the city and deciding to slaughter them is counterproductive,” she said. “Wildlife repopulates itself. Even if they do kill the geese, more will come back to these areas because it’s an attractive place to live.”
Being loved unconditionally by my own mother was a very sacred experience, one like I have never known the likes of, until we had children of our own. I think most mothers would do anything for our children and in some cases have. Being mom to Jennifer, Christopher and Laura has been a priceless gift that never wears out or grows common place for me. They have taught me so much and given me so much love and respect and comfort through this life and I am grateful for them and their goodness. And being a Gramma just cannot be surpassed in any possible way! We adore them, each and every one!
Paper: Blushing Bride, Whisper White, Basic Black, Crumb Cake.
And remember... Bunny Zoe's Crafts ship worldwide, and if you live in mainland UK or Northern Ireland and your order is more than £40.00, you get FREE shipping :)
These ladies crack me up and I thought she might get a kick out of it — and it may remind her of our group of friends and how we laugh together (although never in swimsuits and heels!).
Dave-O also took me to shoot the gun he got me last year for our anniversary. Yep, of course it's a 22. Did you even have to ask? Then we went to Bonefish and had Bang-bang shrimp. What else would you expect me to pair with a night at a shooting range?
B.J. Cunningham
3) Flattened the ball in the centre and fill the centre with 1 tsp of the coconut filling.
Who knows what I’ve been goin’ through
“No problems,” Bitch spoke, translating Angelica’s body language for everyone present. Grue looked at me, and I nodded confirmation.
Anna Bligh 10:30pm (AEST) - "The destructive core, that is, the part of this cyclone that will have the winds of up to 280 - 300 kilometres an hour, spans a distance of about 150 kilometres. It is five times wider than the same core in Cyclone Larry.
Miss Wyoming falls was one of the better ones, but I didn’t really love it. It is a tale of two people who have both abandoned their lives. There is the titular Miss Wyoming, Susan Colgate a former child pageant star and 80s TV actress. She walks away unscathed as the only survivor of a plane crash. She stays away for around a year, leaving the world thinking she is dead. The other is John Johnson, a blockbuster film producer who sells off all his possessions and lives as a homeless man after a near death experience.
Apt. #2 was so appealing and well-equipped that we were on a different planet. The price for the time period we stayed was €1,195/week (US$1,660), a bit less than Apt. #1. That's about US$230 a day and just try to find two hotel rooms with these amenities in the 5th or 6th arr. for less.
-Sheets
All matter is in essence a group of particles vibrating at a common frequency, (a current scientific theory) and it is understandable that we human beings, made up of particles vibrating at a certain frequency, are affected by other vibrating particles–positive or negative–depending on the interaction.
I am of the opinion that a balanced approach to decision making is important. Too much or too less of anything can hurt. After all, a business is not just about money. It’s about the knowledge capital invested, the people and their skills that come into play to serve the customers that pay and expect the best possible service for their dollar. Each of these is vital and more important than that, the harmoniousness of their coming together to form the corporation and all that results from it is unique and truly admirable.
He said: “the resturaunt was full and they worked me like a dog.
a small dissapointment when I'm not pregnant.
Sigh, so many lessons to learn from the Mahabharata and yet how people prefer not to learn.
- olive oil, if needed for texture and/or for drizzling
After the Hindu wedding celebrations were over, most of us headed off in various directions for a few days before we were due to convene in Vallore for the Christian ceremony. Wink and I were going to Pondicherry. We went with Maja and Marina and left them to visit the Shore Temple in Mahabalapuram (I should have checked the spelling of that, it's not way out) before finishing the journey.
People eating at Yo! Sushi
Seriously. Is that not AWESOME? Dark and twisty but a little soft, and very fierce? I mean, okay, so the characters look a little, well, weird... but they are dead. You can't hold that against them. But frankly, I think that girl looks like someone who will kick some serious butt.
Everybody (except my grandfather and Francesca) thought this was hilarious.
I noticed that the water based acrylics are a lot more runny than fabric paint.
Undone is back this March with a very special dance party that you’ve come to love. This month celebrating Dj Burn’s 29th Birthday!
"Didn't anyone complain?" the farmer said.
She is going to be a Nanny for the summer.
Is there any hurry?
The point is that in NOBODY’S lives, no matter how well the cut, are there as perfectly climatic and organized plotlines as we seem to find in “reality” television shows! I know we tend to put celebrities, people with 8 kids, and drunk 20 something year olds who live in Jersey, on a pedestal of high drama pact lives, but in all truth their regular people with somewhat regular lives. No more different from yourself then your next door neighbor.
The embossing folder is a new one for my collection from Sizzix
Although the vast majority of those reading at this site take an interest in news and current affairs, and many of us spend hours tracking down the truth behind news stories we are a tiny minority. Most of the public, especially the young, take little if any interest in “the news”, however, the media have other and far more powerful means of lying to them, through entertainment and popular drama.
We all want to know the answer to that question. The facts are the facts. There were more erasures on our kids’ test papers than on the papers of other kids.
We do not need to make the white children see their skin color as a curse and told they are racists, nor the blacks or Hispanics to feel they are being judged because of their skin color, when that might not really even exist. I think Martin Luther King Jr. would be appalled. Each of us should be judged on the content of our character not the color of our skin. And that includes all kids.
Cause we're embarrassed to say
Allergic reactions can be induced by, literally, anything, from the food we eat, to the medicine we take, to the air we breath and more. Symptoms are often vague and general, making it impossible to get an accurate fix on their prevalence. Was that stomach upset caused by an allergy or was it bad food? Was the headache due to an allergic reaction or stress? Was the death due to a sudden allergy-induced heart attack or was it something else?
* And to any and all Mirror friends — you know who you are — please share your favorite Mirror memories and stories in the comments section.
So what do you think? I hope you have as much fun producing a card with ribbon as I did!! Looking forward to seeing what everyone comes up with at TLT!
I had a big glass of wine (in addition to yummy soup and a wrap sandwich and a big mocha coffee), and while it didn’t hurt my driving-home any I feel somewhat hung-over this morning. (Or maybe it was just the kitten being all excited and/or sleeping on my legs much of the night.)
But as Logan is learning, you can’t always get what you want… at least not right away. To take his mind off the mess, he takes a trip, but even the beautiful Italian, um, scenery can’t keep his thoughts from his erstwhile editor for long. Logan just might have to admit there are some things you can’t run from.
And if you only knew the rest.
-leg lariat with the cane by Punk.
“You fired her for telling you Elizabeth was gone, remember?” Doyle eyed him cautiously. “You’re losing control, Gray. It’s not like you.”
Particular localities and occasions where syncretism was prominent in the ancient world included the city of Naukratis, founded by Pharaoh Amasis in 570 BCE to facilitate trade with the Greek world. The Histories of Herodotus, written in the fifth century BCE, also engages in a great deal of Interpretatio Graeca syncretism in his treatment of the religions of non-Greek cultures, including the Scythians, Egyptians, and Thracians. The life and rule of Alexander the Great in the fourth century BCE, of course, also kicked off a period of fruitfully unprecedented syncretism in the ancient world, with his wide travels and conquests from Greece to India, and particularly his influences in Egypt. It was those Egyptian conquests and activities, carried on after his death by the Ptolemaic dynasty, that has given us some of our most prominent examples of syncretism.
Freddie wrote “Love of My Life’ for Mary, and in an interview once said:
For projects on client sites, I am using TFS 2010 setup with continuous integration.
15-20 leaves of mint
moan--gasp--cry
Recently I needed to engorge on copious amounts of succulent BBQ beef & pork as well as potent liquor, all tenderly prepared and unceremoniously presented (wax paper! recycled mason jars!!) so of course I headed over to my fave Bk BBQ spot, Williamsburg's own Fette Sau (which we all know means "Fat Pig" in German, right? no? well there it is then).
We're now just a couple of hours away from our first waypoint close to South Georgia. Testing of kit has gone well so hopefully we'll soon be into the science. A Fin Whale came fairly close during one of the stops, hopefully there will be plenty more.
Would take our baby brother
I am up a little bit in my weight, and Mom’s keeping an eye on that. I get to start on some new flea medication which should hopefully help out with the slight dermatitis I’ve developed. The doctor said that they would have treated that with a steroid but didn’t want to upset the delicate equilibrium I’ve achieved since coming off the insulin.
I was a little surprised that the second option got so little support, as I might have thought there were a lot of people who were mostly pub drinkers but also liked sampling the more exotic beers at home. Obviously the poll does not go into people’s motivation, but it is noticeable that the biggest single category was those who did all, or virtually all, their drinking at home. I would once have said “mostly in the pub” but am now more “half and half”.
Hence why I used to drive a truck.
The second is called aleevache laddoo- my mother made these from seeds that are called aleev or haleev in Marathi. Aleev seeds have been found to contain a substance similar to the obstetric drug methergine which is used to help the uterus contract post-partum. They are also rich in calcium and iron so everyone, post partum or not, can benefit from eating these seeds. Anita has a post with pictures of aleev seeds and links to information about them.
Five players have also been removed from the squad because of Vodacom Cup quarter-final commitments. Western Province remain unbeaten in the competition and have requested that their star players be released to focus on their play-off match against the Golden Lions.
How To Increase Creativeness
Noah: “Do you mean Wayne, my mom’s dad?”
Holidays have never been my favorite time of year. Past holidays, for me, have been plagued with disappointments and heart ache. I'm trying to remind myself that I've let the past go and I'm moving forward with a better attitude and better insight on how I put myself in situations to be let down. Sadly, I think this has had an affect on two things:
I love the adoption community. I feel like I've been rather plucked out of it here in the ATL. But, thank you Jesus for using facebook...I can keep my heart intertwined to those I have grown to love that share this passion.
Back on topic though, the Hully Gully was a much better time than I could have expected, not being fanatical about 80s music or dancing where people can see me. Our friends from the North helped a lot with that though. And the Long Beach Mardi Gras had potential but was unorganized and lacked the type of shameless people who would really make it shine. I’ve never actually been to Mardi Gras in New Orleans however, so I really have no basis for comparison.
So this Sunday, I say Happy Mother’s Day to the future version of me. But not in a creepy way. Not in a Type-A, anal overplanner, Octomom way. Simply in an “I know there are good things in store” kind of way.
I came out of my stall and saw the woman. She wasn't coming all the way in. She stayed by the entrance. I asked "Are there men in here?" She replied in the affirmative.
If you'd like to become a guest blogger, send me an email at
I jerk my arm that’s rapped tightly around his neck, with little effect. His rock hard exterior won’t give to my feminine stature. My blazing core pores out my body, heat rising from every inch of skin. Slowly he lets go of the girl. I won’t let go of him just yet, I’m not through with him.
Whether you want to lose weight or want to maintain a fit and healthy lifestyle, Sparkpeople is a great place to go. It is FREE to join, which is always nice. There are so many tools and features that you can use to help keep you on track. They even have a community forum where you can connect with other members of the site. Perhaps you would like to chat with people who have similar goals or intests as you. If so, you can join a sparkteam, or start your own team.
We were good kids and made it to 9:30 a.m. Easter mass. Although I think E just wanted a chance to bust out his seersucker pants, and I didn’t get anything out of the service besides an aisle seat at the St. John Vianney spring fashion show. The little girl in front of us did “the worm” and stuck her feet in her older brother’s mouth the entire hour. Can anyone seriously pay attention during Easter mass with all the kids in their adorable outfits squirming like crazy because A. they already hunted for eggs and have had way too much sugar, or B. they’re excited about hunting for eggs. I was excited about brunch.
Hello everyone - Sue here for our last challenge at Ladybug Crafts Ink for 2011!
You and I know it was really the Voodoo.
handful chopped parsley
Now I knew what he had been hiding. This whole time he had probably been wondering if he would be able to rip me off.
10. Something is Squeezing My Skull (Years of Refusal)
A better way to mount a sling other than WWI era standard swivels. This has multiple swivel mount points. That's fine.
Stockholm has a much more extensive subway/rail system than Toronto (surprise, surprise). Four lines spider out from the main train terminal on Östermalm. Surface routes are covered mainly by buses and the odd streetcar/trolley services some spots. It also utilizes a ferry system since it contends with water on all sides. Not for nothing is Stockholm referred to as the Venice of the north.
And you haven't answered the question you started with: how did the characters get on the boat. This is all set up and possible motivation for killing the agent (as if anyone needs motivation to kill an agent.)
Be assured that your love and compassion for others will always replace your fuming over be slighted by them. Yes, if you call upon Him, God’s own divine wisdom will lead you to make changes in you and how you deal with everyone else in your life. He may even reveal how you played a key role in creating whatever problems you face . . . along with a way out of the mess!
After all these years, after movies with higher profiles and bigger stars and bigger stakes, somehow, I still think this is one of my best moments, because it was my very first commentary track ever, done in the service of a close friend who was also recording her first commentary track ever. As such, while both of us would go on to more polished work, here we were like two kids playing dress-up and going for broke, me as the overly prepared interviewer, her as the iconoclastic director. Sure, I think you'll learn a lot about this specific movie and indie filmmaking in general from our talk, but I think you'll also learn about us and who we were all those years ago. And I think the thrill of the best commentaries is not so much dry information but really gaining intuition into the personalities of those artists that move us, what makes them tick...and in certain moments, finding out why we were drawn to each other.
Donahue
Now to ever not so merry England.
JLo #americanidol I’m way too pretty to be sitting between you 2 buffoons.
Just won a significant battle of wills with Her Majesty tonight that included much screaming and throwing of one's self on the floor and kicking (all of this H.M., not me), but it's left both of us feeling drained and worn out. (She's asleep, finally). So when I found an email in my inbox saying that there would be another emergency meeting next weekend relating to H.M.'s daycare and the financial woes it is facing, I decided that it was time to throw in the towel for tonight. Frankly, I'm about ready to throw in the towel on the daycare, period. The church that runs the daycare--or at least prominent people in the church--seem inclined to shut it down, and I'm not sure I have either the energy or the inclination to fight for it anymore. I've put out feelers for recommendations among friends a few times since all this financial stuff came to light (which I have not blogged about, because it's too tiresome for words), but I've always felt vaguely traitorous about doing so, since I am the Board Chair and all (of the daycare, not of the church). But now it just may be time to start putting H.M.'s name on some waiting lists. Kee-rist, I hate the idea of it.
One day Alyssa arrived downtown for one of our Abba gigs wearing a princess costume because she forgot to bring a change of clothes after giving a princess party. So together we had to walk around downtown with her still in her costume. I had the best time ever laughing with her at the looks people were giving her, struggling to keep a straight face as if it is perfectly normal to be wandering around Gastown with Cinderella. Anyhow I have always wished to do a video for Alyssa to support her because just in knowing her I was virtually certain she was the most perfect princess ever.
‘We chose Singapore for several reasons – it is very keen on developing first-class education and it is putting resources behind it.
I didn’t have the patience to wait for 10 years. 5 years later I pulled the diaries into the daylight anticipating a good read.
The true genius of these ads comes from the honesty. Every craft beer love can probably attest to a time they've rolled their eyes when a macrobrewer tries to claim their beer has a "cold flavor", or even worse, that it will make you popular, attractive, or more fun. Breckenridge concisely cuts through the crap with such delightful deadpan. For craft beer lovers, a lot of the messaging is familiar. Almost a "well, duh" moment. But for anyone who has ever checked a can to see if their beer is cold, these ads serve as a wake up call in a humorous and straightforward way.
Aquarius archetypes:
But none of that matters really?
Oh God why!
I stamped the image onto X-Press It card stock, coloured him up with copics and then stamped and coloured his arms only.
I wonder if they've done studies on the twenty-minute factor. Maybe everything gets easier if you stick to it for 20 mins. Maybe the payoff is always better if you do something for longer than that allotment of time.
Fareda: But what use is this form of education when all we get to learn is to write our names?
I learn to bubble
5. Dave Evans - Sad Pig Dance
My test unit was powered by the 1.4-litre four cylinder GM engine that has 74kW and 130Nm. The engine felt a little sluggish, partly due to the vehicle having very few miles on it. It’s not a bad engine though but you do need to give it some revs to build up speed. Once you’re on the open road, the Sonic settles down nicely and is a rather decent mile-muncher. Fuel consumption was surprisingly high, despite Chevrolet claiming a figure of 5.8L/100km. By the time the Sonic went back, I was sitting at just under 9L/100km.
” Yup….i just realised that it’s no use holding onto each word he said,each memory which was exclusively ours if i what am fighting for is to get him out of my mind.I really don’t have to close the entire book,just turning the page and forgetting about it should suffice.And i am not that weak,am i Vidhi,when each breath i take,every time i look at him and don’t break down to the miserable creature i had become proves that i can live ? As long as i have people like you and mom holding me in place,i don’t have to be The Kid.I simply can not afford the luxury of being him.” I said and immediately felt some of the crushing weight on my psyche lighten.
Day 26: On a scale of 1 to 10 rate your day today and why?
Rhythm Pigs - S/T (Mordam 1986)
3 tbsp all purpose flour
Though I'm not clear,
I'm a religious person, and I believe that God has a plan for my life. I find it hard to believe sometimes that I would be gifted with a creative mind full of characters that demand to be let out of my head and onto paper, if I wasn't meant to be a writer. But at the same time, I have to be realistic. Although it's what I want, it might not be the path that's best for me. Perhaps my characters are only meant to keep me company and not to be shared with the wider world! At the end of the day, I'll still have a degree, and job prospects (however limited in this economic climate!) if my writing is just not meant to be.
43. Would you like fries with that?? Love this song.....
I've still got to clear half an apartment's worth of 'why?' to make some building space.
Even when things turned to the better and I was able to go to school, things would get in the way with my bipolar or my physical problems like my spinal pinch or feet problems from the sudden weight gain. Or the season would shift and I'd have to adjust my meds because of a sudden manic flare up. Curve balls come every way, no matter who you are or what you're dealing with. That's just life.
The congressional mandate of the Community Relations Service includes a confidentiality agreement that bars officials from revealing the identity of parties taking part in negotiations without their permission, Harris said.
SUCCESSIVE WAVES CAN BE FIVE MINUTES TO ONE HOUR.
With the re-engineered design, driving dynamics of the new Porsche Boxster are a vast improvement from the old model, with the Boxster accelerating from zero to 60 mph in 5.4 seconds, while the the Boxster S does the same in 4.7 seconds.
...stitching them to the front of the bin through the felt.
(I swear this is knitting related, just bear with me.)
“Almost? I would say more than everything!”
What: Maryland Brewer's Oktoberfest
But this also raises the question of what should the police actually do if they are asked to restrain or convey – for whatever background reason?
5. Make sure teachers have some training and guided practice time. Nothing’s gonna kill an iPad rollout quicker than teachers who don’t feel comfortable with the device.
Vietnamese Dipping Sauce
But concerning issues of telling a woman what to do with her body regarding abortion or attacking people who live alternative lifestyles, conservatives scheme all they can to use government and airtime to intrude on personal freedom, including attacking gay people via campaign rhetoric as Perry did.
Anyway, here is the rare my high-fashion and stylish photo of me and Peanut at 27 weeks. I am having the glucose test tomorrow, marking the beginning of the third trimester.
Not that I am a saint or anything even close (although I’m sure Danny emphatically, lovingly, and in true preservation of self, disagrees with that!). I’m not trying to make myself sound like I am. In fact, I have a lot I could be doing better as far as Mass goes. Ever since I gave Genevieve the Bible for her baptism day, I’ve been trying to read it with her a little bit before Mass, but as far as my own personal preparation… I’m not going to lie, I get lazy. And then there’s daily Mass, a habit that I have fallen out of in the past few years. I used to go a lot when I worked at the elementary school, because the church was right next door. That was almost 4 years ago though. Through much personal laziness and also a bit of irritation at the ever-changing Mass schedules due to re-forming the parishes in Nanticoke, I haven’t been to daily Mass very frequently. I wish that St. Mary’s here in WB had a morning Mass, but their daily Mass is at 12:10. They probably made it that time so working people like me could just walk over and attend Mass on their lunch break, unfortunately I haven’t been lucky enough in my last two jobs in WB to go to lunch at that time. St. Nick’s is right down the road, but their daily Mass is 6:30… even that half-hour difference between 6:30 and 7 is incredibly disheartening to a 24 year old who just wants to SLEEP as much as possible and wouldn’t crack an eyelid until noon if she could.
* To set variables in ‘unix’:
I am no longer angry with words. Words carefully chosen bring life. Indeed, I have chosen to follow the Word.
Handmade Scallop Felt Border (4)
Born on March 23, 1986, Mark Walsh grew up surrounded by horses in Clane, County Kildare. Although not related to Ted and Ruby, Mark’s cousin David was also a successful jockey and was best known for riding Barton Bank to finish second to Mr Mulligan in the 1997 Cheltenham Gold Cup. Walsh began riding ponies and going hunting from an early age and soon progressed to race-riding on the pony circuit. He started to work for Christy Roche when he was
I have heard of many bad dream stories of distinct types of cockroaches living in an old unused drain in the house. When homeowners finally find the time to clean these areas, they are typically already so heavily infested that it is beyond their control.
Layer for the Seasons
We had been married a whopping 9 months, just purchased our first little nest and were happily on our way down the dual income no kids way of life road.
But on a lighter note those hateful idiots at Factcheckme seem to still be coming here every once in a while....Later.
In researching these companies, it was interesting that Facebook didn’t have a clearly defined code of ethics listed in the same way other companies did. For more about Facebook, check out the Wall Street Journal article: Facebook Agrees to Work With Government on Germany Privacy Code.
Traditions are like the ratings for Two & a Half Men – they help to justify a lot of things. Not everything (hopefully), but just enough to allow you to condone blatant acts of stupidity. And so, as one television company has persisted in embracing Charlie Sheen, I have decided to persist in embracing marathon viewings of classic movies and the B-grade sequel spawn they produce.
A voice I am sending as I walk.
This is not to say that action has not been taken; for example, the students at UC Davis responded superbly to the now-viral video of the riot police casually tear gassing students sitting on the lawn. Sitting on the lawn! God forbid they assemble peaceably! In any case, when it came to light that the chancellor herself called upon the riot police to disperse the dangerous group of sit-in protesters, the students assembled (cue pepper spray) and waited for her to leave for the day, and when she left the building, she was greeted with a mass of students lining the sidewalk staring at her in utter silence. It wasn't merely the fact that it reminded me of Hitchcock's The Birds, but rather the incredible and creepy-yet-powerful-as-shit message that was sent that needed no words -- just a few minutes of awkward silence and an aura that screams disapproval. That, my friends, is the power of assembly all those above the ladder fear -- the power to shake through unspoken words, for imagine if they had raised their voices in protest?
Israel is back in the Lebanese quagmire.
3. Infinite Sorrow of the Vampyre - 04:46
“Remember: this ‘power’ does not originate with you – you are its conduit. Think of it as a request you are sending to the universe. “
Fortunately the concept of engineering has changed a good deal according for the heavier built boats of yesteryear. Today’s boats are lighter, faster, and stronger than we have now ever seen before. Fat this needs more active tactics on the crews behalf.
Though this story involves a lot of weight loss, this isn’t entirely a weight loss story. Among the things I discovered, one of them is that my weight and my eating disorder, though related, aren’t entirely tied to each other. Part of the problem for me is simply genetic when it comes to my weight. Before middle school, before I developed an eating disorder and became obese, I was already a pretty hefty child but I wasn’t really eating much more than my skinny (constantly underweight) sister Christa. My poor mom didn’t know what to do because she had doctors whining at her that Christa was underweight and that I was overweight and both of us were eating nearly the same way.
More than just storytelling sessions, though, the activity became a way for Gordon to exercise his analytical abilities in regard to narratives — it began to seem to him that the information he was being given was not the most solid information despite the fact that these were real stories about real people.
The last Broken Social Scene record before their 5-year hiatus (which was less a hiatus and more a chance for the band members to release solo records with rest of the band as support) was less universally well-regard than its predecessor You Forgot It In People, and presented yet another facet of the band, who seems to do something different with every record; abandoning the tightly structured and highly organized style of YFIIP in favor of throwing walls of sound at the listener, not exactly sprawling but rather tumbling messily from section to section, in the process crafting a record with a noted tendency to jam. The record often threatens to spill off the rails when that tendency gets out of control, particularly on "Windsurfing Nation," where for some reason they decide to start rapping. There are moments all over the record that are almost over-indulgent, and individually none are, but taken together threaten to overwhelm the album. They don't, but it's a close thing.
I’m being dragged now; he’s pulling me by my hair back into the hallway. I let out a straggled moan as I reach up to grab his hands in order to ease some of the tension on my hair. I struggle a bit trying to make it harder on him, but it only makes everything hurt more so I let my body go limp, it’ll be easier this way, less pain. I look up through my swollen eye lids to look at Jack, his brown hair in disarray, hands pulling roughly at my hair as he drags me. He turns to look down at me, his eyes are empty, and he isn’t there.
Some experts oppose an attack because they claim that even a successful strike would, at best, delay Iran’s nuclear program for only a short time. But their analysis is faulty. Today, almost any industrialized country can produce a nuclear weapon in four to five years — hence any successful strike would achieve a delay of only a few years. What matters more is the campaign after the attack. When we were briefed before the Osirak raid, we were told that a successful mission would delay the Iraqi nuclear program for only three to five years. But history told a different story.
2 cups spinach, arugula or mixed greens
But, hey, it's all good to HSUS, right? These highly publicized cases garnered them untold amounts in donations, their phony agents got to dress up like "real-live cops" complete with guns-a-blazin', over-inflated egos got blown up some more. So what that these owners were denied their rights and helpless animals ended up dead, right?
I woke up this morning with 2 more reasons to love sports.
What I miss: Do I even need to answer this...Wine.
1 tsp dehydrated garlic (crushed), or garlic powder
*Thank you Nutrisystem for providing my meals in exchange for my honest opinion of the program*
Mr Cuff said the only answer to the problem would be to “prosecute them, and prosecute them hard”.
"In short: with organizations like these it’s all about bringing weak countries into the NWO power-structure by ‘advising’ them to take on large loans –from the World Bank, the IMF, Goldman Sachs- that they can never pay back.
Sayid most certainly did. He led Locke to the reveal of peaceful Desmond tied to a tree.
In the weight area, I am at a new low, only 36 pounds to my goal, which means I am 44 pounds down. I have been walking more to try to wear myself out and my appetite is crap, so the weight is moving slowly. It has been stalled since November, so I am glad to see at least that is going the right way.
And God created Cat.
I have been playing with making my own washi tape again today, this time printing it out on the computer.
1)Grab my attention and keep it all the way through by being a good story, intriguing and interesting, thought provoking and intellectually stimulating (but being a really good story will do).
Working with the horses clearly shows us the ways we think—and how those ways might be keeping us from seeing the whole picture.
Jabberwocky Books, 810 Caroline Street, Fredericksburg, VA 22401
Peter, I tip my hat to you my friend, for your professionalism, the pride you demonstrated in your work and your humble service. It’s that type of performance that give our industry a good name and ensured my friend and I enjoyed our evening.
Major Lazer ft. Mr. Lexx and Santigold – Hold the Line (2009)
This is the spot where the Great Fire of NY (1835) began., which destroyed about 700 buildings. Megan told me to "look like I was on fire." At first I had a hard time.
The backing paper (source unknown) not only had the holly on but recipes too, which is perfect for Ken as he is the cook in the house (aren't I the lucky one?)
It is amazing to think that Marilyn is as much a part of our culture today as she was at the height of her career in the 1950′s. Her image hasn’t dated and she is still an inspiration to many.
Suzie Townsend my beloved colleague at FPLM is offering a critique of the first page of your manuscript. There are guidelines on her blog here.
Gifts-wise, we took it easy this year. For Carissa, I had already gone halves in her car, paid for Sydney trip and so this year to unwrap she had a GHD Limited Edition "Precious Set" a keyring with her name on it, Dermalogica beauty kit, a cat brooch and a few extra bits and pieces. That was just from me. She recieved much more from family and friends.
Arthur's favourite place from where he can overlook the whole neighborhood
Email Relay is one of the more annoying features of email servers. However, there are times it can be pretty useful. It’s annoying because Spammers love to exploit it, and it’s useful because it can allow you to centralize a lot of email services.
So today I decided to stop by and certain retail establishment and fill out an application. This happens to be one of the few places that still accepts paper applications, mind you, so I was feeling pretty good about it. I filled it out and handed it to the manager. So tell me why, after looking over it, she exclaims, “SMU!? Aren’t you a little over qualified for this position?” So responded how I usually respond when asked a stupid question like that. I strung together a series of vowel songs to form the song like version of a Rorschach blot. ”yyyeeeeaaaiiiiuuuuoooo.” Throw in some facial expressions for added effect and watch as people see what they want. So apparently, having a bachelors overqualifies you for low paying jobs and underqualifies you for high paying jobs. Good to know but let that spawn, Sallie Mae, dial my number. I’m going to let her know some things as well.
The supporting cast is wonderful as well. They give quite the counter-balance to Bateman’s madness and hysteria. Reese Witherspoon has a small, yet pertinent role as Bateman’s girlfriend who is a regular materialistic, high society snob that’s rather oblivious to Patrick in general, and Bateman, in return, cannot stomach her. Willem Dafoe wonderfully portrays Detective Donald Kimball, who is hired to investigate the disappearance of one of Patrick’s co-workers – Paul Allen (Jared Leto). Through the brilliance of Dafoe’s acting and Mary Harron’s directing, you never quite know what Kimball does or doesn’t know. He keeps Bateman guessing – not to mention sweating. While much has been admittedly attributed to editing two different performances by Dafoe, he delivers both qualities with a great deal of skill. He has fantastic chemistry with Bale.
-Bake in oven 20-25 minutes at 450
The color is a hazy light copper with a fluffy just off-white head. One whiff and even if you didn't read the label, you'd know it's a ginger beer. The most powerful flavor is, of course, ginger, but there's some malt and a bit of hops in the finish. It's not particularly complex, but I do think the ginger is well balanced. Just a tinge of that ginger heat, too. You don't need to worry about the alcohol in this one, just 4.5%. I'm thinking of some Chinese dishes this would be the perfect match with.
Good news Singaporeans! With Scoot soon launching its services from Singapore to Australia, they’ve taken a decision to utilise the aircraft movements in between their medium-long haul flights by adding a daily service to Bangkok and 4 time weekly service to Tianjin. Whilst no photos have been released of the Scoot product yet (As soon as they are, they will be up on DesignAir!) they are definitely offering a medium-long haul low cost on-board product similar in concept to Air Asia X, offering both ‘Scoot Biz’ seats and regular economy seats.
The other memory concerns Gary Neville, who was commentating for Sky, and his brave but ill judged and wholly unconvincing, attempt to impersonate a South American commentator’s reaction when a goal is scored. This involved letting out what can only be described as a guttural, prolonged moan. Perhaps Neville had been inflated before the game was rapidly losing all his air, either that or co commentator Alan Parry was giving him a severe goosing!
"All stories have theme, even if the theme is buried. Even if it is unintentional," I said. "I'm just suggesting the work is stronger when the author is working with theme in mind."
We had lots of pretty legit excuses. We're preparing for a month-long trip to Thailand, holidays winding down, dog passing away, et cetera, et cetera.
Paul DeCola, 39, Ridgewood, N.Y.
I’m sure I’m not using the term in the same way theologians might. I’m not really referencing God’s saving grace. Nor his Divine grace and love directly, although I believe we have it in us to give because we are part of the Divine.
“Noteworthy also is the oft-quoted comment by Rabbi Moshe Alshech, writing in the sixteenth century, ‘Our rabbis with one voice accept and affirm the opinion that the prophet is speaking of the Messiah, and we shall ourselves also adhere to the same view.’” (49)
When I wanted to start my blog, part of it was because I read several that are so incredibly witty and amusing and entertaining. And, since I've always loved writing, I assumed that I could create something like that, too. But, the thing is, it seems that every time I sit down to write it just comes out so melancholy.
Graeme and I were standing over the blob, gazing at it rather forlornly, when he said, "Wait!" He turned the baking sheet around, and said, "Look - it's a perfect troll face." And indeed it was.
However I also understand science and I understand that, before a certain point, a fetus is not viable and is only surviving by, essentially, feeding off the energy of the mother. I also can understand that, during that period of the first 12 to 15 weeks, a person may decide, for various reasons, to not bring that child into the world.
The Dragonfly:
I think the elephant and the bicycle could be quite a good match.
Kyle started his homework at 4:05 p.m. He has football practice at 5:45. How long does he have to complete his homework before he has to go to football practice?
Kit boy happily came back with his plastic bag full of colourful eggs and keep telling me that he has got many eggs. Immediately I counted the eggs and proudly told Daddy that he had found 10 eggs but because majority of his treasures were the same colour, Kit boy did not win anything.
2. Mix 1 can sweetened condensed milk with 1 cup boiling water. In a small bowl, sprinkle 2 pkg unflavored gelatin over 1/2 cup cold water. Let stand a few minutes and then add 1/2 c boiling water to dissolve gelatin; add to milk mixture and stir to combine. Cool to room temp and pour 1 cup of milk mixture over first layer of jello. Refrig for 15 minutes.
What, me? Again?
Some of you may know that I've just started eating meat, after a 10 year hiatus, and I'm having a lot of fun experimenting with adding meat to meals, where there would have been none. So J asked me if I would mind if he made a bacon, mushroom and BBQ sauce pizza. I told him I thought it needed more vegetables, so he added the last of our two eggs. Close, but I still knew there were limited vegetables on it.
Snow 2: Brain Freeze ... ABC Family ... 9:30 AM
Sumo Dead-lift High-Pull: 75 pounds. (Reps)
I have no problem that allows for customers to review a business and for the owner to easily respond. Tripadvisor allows customers to be as vague or specific as they like. It doesn't check the validity of the review. And it allows the customer to remain anonymous. I'll copy and paste our last two reviews from the site to show you what I mean:
For as the digital age has fragmented everything it has touched, unleashing potentials for radical good and bad, so cinema must respond by finding new languages of fragmentation which speak to the needs of the times. Why must a plot follow a main character? Why not follow instead the permutations of a unifying phrase? We long to see dynamics and change, this is how a plot hooks us, we learn a situation, then we become curious to see how it will develop its potential for change. But we need not follow the old plots based on traditional characters overcoming traditional obstacles.
The Canadian family of spoken word and poetry slam shows will grow by one this evening at Waterfalls Restaurant in Kensington Market when Bill’s Brown’s 1-2-3 Slam Toronto officially holds its inaugural show. While this is an exciting moment for slam lovers in the megacity, just north of its borders an equally important development will take place seven days from now.
Toodelipip! xoxox Eila
By the time today is over, another vast area of pristine rainforest will be gone, all to keep our biscuits rich and our shampoos creamy. The environment on which we all depend cannot wait and neither must we.
But seriously though, I ADORE How I Met Your Mother. A lotlotlotlotlot.
He was most excited about all the repins that happened once he posted these on pinterest. I have to admit that I'm impressed with his designs and enthusiasm for his projects, especially right now, when my energy level is so low.
Apparently, ‘corn’ is a term used to refer to any sort of cereal crop, including, wheat, barley, and what I was thinking of as corn is called maize. It starts its life as a type of corn, specifically as maize, then is cut down, stripped and bagged up by the Birds’ Eye polar bear and sold as either corn on the cob or sweetcorn, or failing that is puffed up and sugar coated, and sold as Butterkist popcorn. Unnecessarily confusing if you ask me, and greedy of the farmers who already have an umbrella term for that type of crop – cereal. Why they need a second is beyond me, but as much as I rant here, I’ll keep my lips firmly zipped when out in public among more agricultural folk; until I’ve learned a little – okay, a lot – more, they remain the experts.
It's like all things - the more you do, the more you discover. I've messed around with bees wax for years but never really stayed with it. It was always a diversion. Well, I have stayed with it for the past week and am finding I have entered new territory that really interests me. Collaging bits of wax paper I've used to lift oil paint from my work (god, I have stacks of it everywhere) onto rice paper, layering wax, painting over, torching, burning, waxing, painting, ripping, attaching - the possibilities are endless. Painting with my little torch is thrilling. All that wax and oil moving about the surface. Painting more and scraping back - it's very addictive. The photo below is a piece of paper I worked on yesterday.
This slippery slope is now obvious. What started off as a ‘legitimate response to the Western invasions of Muslim countries’ now takes on a different tone. The shift may now be to Palestine or the US presence in Saudi Arabia. Why should it stop there? Perhaps the Danish cartoons provided Muslims with a good reason to respond with Islamoterrorism. And the Satanic Verses way back in the 1980s?
Then tonight is not the first night of my year, it's the last night.
Thanks for looking :-) Please leave me a comment so I know you popped by :-)
Naruto: 244
FYI I am ready to go (She is letting you know she is ready to sell her soul)
here's the song:
Okay, that last part is negotiable, but there we are.
Conclusion: So what now?
Tuesday, 5/29: Slow cooker — Tomato lentil soup
But lets not forget about Apple ability to make things easy to use. It is not only about applying recently emerged technology, but also analyzing current needs of society and improving user experience. And perfect timing of course.
That at least was the set up in the past.
I thank you in advance for your understanding and am looking forward to expanding LTC with some scrummy new goodies.
Neither announcement was a shock, but coming on the same day they made me think about the stars in every field, the people who have had outstanding careers.
And when the glow of love wears off? “A woman’s tongue is a thing that does not rust” is well met by “Men are like bagpipes—they make no sound until they're full.”
Yesterday we had to drop Andrew off for his jail tour. While we were waiting for him to finish we ran over to the new Kohl's to look around. While we were paying for Amber's new shoes, she had the following conversation with the cashier. Keep in mind that Amber does not speak quietly. Ever. She is always at half-yell when she is talking. (My=I and My=my in Amber talk)
My sister came to stay with me once five years ago. I took her on a tour of my house because that is what my mother said I was supposed to do when someone came to my house for the first time. I showed her my living room because it was the first room. I couldn’t not show it to her because it’s the room the front door opens in to. As I took her through the house, she saw all my labels. When we got to my bedroom she started laughing.
To me it's all amazing when you consider what Dr. F said to me at this most recent appointment.
As my appetite is back, we had a buffet dinner in Holiday Villa Subang on Saturday. I bought 2 Groupon vouchers for RM90.
And then I think, am I just making excuses to go back/be around him?
I always joke that I glow from all the tests I have had done in the past 6 years! Well , now I really will glow!! LOL!
It seems like just yesterday I blogged about embarking upon the dreaded San Francisco Unified District school tours. We found out which school we got into back in March. Then the rest of the year frisked right by and the beginning of the school year hit us. Geekygirl is a kindergartener, with two full weeks at her new elementary school under her belt. She loves it. She loves her uniforms, navy and white, though I failed to calculate the number of possible permutations and combinations a creative girl can consider when she has five different bottoms and three different shirt styles to choose from in the morning. When you add in the fact that they are allowed to wear legging or tights of any color under their skirts we still end up taking quite some time to get ready of a morning!
Place a skillet over medium heat; add the olive oil and when hot add the leeks and onions. Sauté for 5 minutes until soften. Sprinkle with dill, salt and pepper, remove from skillet and add to the bowl with the spinach.
Another interesting element of Albinia’s novel is her use of poetry as an integral part of the narrative. Meera Chaturvedi had been a poet and after her untimely death, Vyasa had published a book of her poems. However, he had omitted one of the poems because it reflected badly on him and on his relations with the two sisters. At the beginning of the novel, this previously unseen poem is published in the newspaper. It comes to the attention of Vyasa’s daughter Bharati, who is doing her doctoral dissertation on her mother’s poems. The poem seems to hint that Meera had a literary collaborator and also hints at some dark family secrets. The poem is a retelling of the incident in the Mahabharata in which Vyasa impregnates his brother’s wives. It is worth quoting in full (223-224):
But if being the bedtime nazi gives you a sense of peace and order in your lives, I'm sure your family is used to it by now. Kids are resilient like that.
And in case anyone wants to jazz up their party playlists before the holidays, the song featured in the commercial comes from the 1958 soundtrack to "Les Liaisons Dangereuses" performed by Art Blakey's Jazz Messengers.
Your SXSW mission is simple: Go for 24 hours straight watching music. Here is your guide.
"The only route of escape the prosecutor might have is to ask whether there is ongoing process in the US against these people," Boye told the Observer. "This case will go ahead. It will be against the law not to go ahead."
There’s more to try we’re not done yet,
OHMYGAWD. It was awesome. The rice was my favorite part, but the veggies were a close second. They cooked them in oil and seasoned them with just a little salt, pepper, and chili powder. Spicy! I felt kinda guilty and a bit awkward with all my food; she actually showed up later with some black beans, just in case I was still hungry. I was all, seriously, thank you, but I have to fit into the bridesmaid dress I was sized for eight months ago. A lady has her limits. And then I ate half of the black beans anyway.
All of this nonsense is more evidence of why locally elected politicians should be banned from having anything to do with serious issues like policing. I do not believe that Jones comments were an April fool, but it is a suitable date to have her on the telly.
Finally...FINALLY, he hands out the best justice to Lilly as we know he will force her to dig Evelyn's grave with her bare hands.
12 - Dying Fetus - Raping the System
In the words of Fred Weasley, “A scrawny, specky git.” Ah, I don’t know. I’m sure I look a little on the malnourished side and my pants have a hard time staying up without a belt. I’m pretty average, and it’s probably why people don’t automatically assume I have a disease. After they find out though, I like to think that, in confidently explaining to them what Crohn’s is, they see me as someone enjoying everything she can in life. And that’s exactly what I do.
Still though if I were you I’d stay up in those hills till you see the white flags waving.
I know so much about English history, some I admit I have researched since, (although not the crusades) but most I learnt at school, and it has stayed with me. These were not just great and exciting stories, but they were valuable parts of my education which taught me about my country and my heritage. My parent's generation, of course, were taught far more of the truth about Britain's great and glorious history, which left them, as it had left generations of Britons before them with a sense of pride in their nation, and in themselves.
Chris Dunn has this to say about the incredibly flat granite surfaces of the Serapeum, the’boxes’ within the Great Pyramid -
Timothy....Buoys
6. It is loshon hora to speak against a community or to make harmful remarks about children—even your own.
stir to combine then top with the cream cheese.
If you are a super important VIP, your time is valuable–right? Instead of driving between locations, you must work, work, work on your important things. I do not imagine such persons would be concerned with $30 fares.
To tell you the truth, this project has been absolutely grueling. I've been crazed and harried since mid-May, waking up in the middle of the night to make notes about drum fills, or record background vocal ideas on my iPhone. During the recording, I'm pretty sure I felt the complete range of human emotion in the course of each day. The release date has been moved to January (following the advice of a radio promotion firm), which means I've got another five months of the same to look forward to.
I took out my phone and dialed Lynda. When she picked, she sounded sleepy and even before I inquired, she told me she had been up all night taking care of ‘our son’. I told her to get ready for a DNA test tomorrow with the boy and then she sounded really terrified. I wondered why…but, there could be many reasons beyond lies.
4 – 7 p.m. Real Ale Brewing Company, Sampling in the Beer Department
Thank you for stopping by! I wish you luck as you journey with your new OLW for 2012. I'm so thankful for our monthly blog hop and Ali's monthly prompts that really help us think about our word, keeping it alive in our minds and hearts.
The receptionist called her to see the counselor in the examination room. She was a stout dark skinned woman with a kind face who sported an impressive mane of African tresses that contrasted with her white nurse’s uniform. “Hi, I’m Tammy. I’ll be going over the procedure with you and address any concerns you might have about it.” She sat at the table in the middle of the room. “Now before we begin, we just want to check that you’re sure of your decision.”
*They moved to a new location.
In the meantime--why don't you go and see what Traci's been up to today! If you've missed any of my previous posts you can click the link on my side-bar to see all my 30/30/30 posts.
CHALLEGE:
Mrs. de Wet awoke to the smell of smoke at about 22:00 on Saturday night. She saw the wall and the curtain in her room were in flames.
The Problems
I like the words of Krishna, Vyasa, Valmiki and other Rishis and the words of Sankaracharya and Ramanujacharya.
Relax the grip you have upon the narrow dimension of time that you find yourself in. There is so much that is dancing within. It is all a play of energy! Use this understanding to receive the next installment of your life’s lessons. What you may now consider to be worrisome or distracting is all fuel for your creativity. And this we ask: create everyday, whether in realms of writing, music, art or dance. Your path is about creating and manifesting energetic signatures of the heart.
Anyway, the part that really gets me — in my son’s life and in Ms. Robinson’s essay — is that when kids are so bored and miserable as to be disruptive, the punishment of choice seems to be: No recess.
* In Islam, Muslims believe in all the prophets sent by God – and hold all of them in the highest regard. So, whenever the name of a prophet is mentioned, Muslims add the phrase ‘Peace be upon him’ – out of respect for the individual.
April 25, 2006 Special Dispatch No.1146
to be brought to us.
“In most emerging countries, the issuer side is normally regarded to be more crucial in ensuring the success of the bond market,” said an industry player. Corporates will be asked to issue more bonds, while details such as structure and size will be scrutinised.
I've started with a base of Very Vanilla, layered with Old Olive and more Vanilla. The layer of Vanilla has been stamped with Vintage Wallpaper in Memento Desert Sand. Next I've added a strip of Olive, a piece of ribbon and then a piece of Fawn Bazzill (punched on one side) that has also been stamped with Vintage Wallpaper - but on the darker paper it doesn't show as strongly. My feature panel has been stamped using Just Keep Calm in Memento Bamboo Leaves and Rich Cocoa (for the sentiment). It was then cut out using Nested Medallion Label Dies and framed with Old Olive cut with Lacey Squares and all popped up on foam tape. To finish I've added a Prima flower, some branches cut with Foliage Shapeabilities and a few pearls.
Mining “Field of Study” / Major as a variable
This study acknowledges and places within a postmodern context the contribution of 312 Africans to the development of the Caribbean civilisation, in particular the sugar monoculture of St Kitts and the sugar plantation of Wingfield, Old Road. Today the St Kitts economic is centred around the hotel and tourism industry where now ruined sugar plantations, which were the erstwhile workplace and community for African workers, are now ‘exotic sweet sugar paradise isles’ offering offshore financial opportunities, ‘exclusive holiday resorts and villa estates’, marriage locations and adventures, bikini, sun, sand, ‘Citizenship by Investment’, and other economic incentives to a predominantly European American market. African Americans and African Europeans also return to experience distorted stories from which they and their ancestors, the nation builders, are distorted and omitted. Today, Wingfield is a ruin, but has undergone and is still undergoing redevelopment. The ‘island adventure’ offers a range of goods and services to the million dollar hotel and tourism industry, such as a Botanical Gardens, island adventures, water sports, food, drinks, and accommodation are made available for tourists to purchase. So, despite being a ruin, Wingfield has a sizeable economic value, but the Africans and their descendants who build and maintained the plantation over the centuries are largely forgotten or hidden within the current redevelopments.
Race: Human
I have a few bigger ones I'm painting now...I'll have to show you when they're done.
The next day:
Reactor 4: The Most Imminent Threat
I am able. (II Corinthians 9:8)
While we were out, we also bought a new lunchbox and some new clothes. Two pairs of trousers, two t-shirts and five pairs of socks. Paul was especially happy with the socks, even though they’re just plain, white tennis socks, but these are apparently extra extra comfy.
and walking the waterside promenade newly built by the hands of tiny Swedes (I like to pretend)
Systematically tracking down the best kind of men, that's what.
VERITAS Device Discovery Layer Services Provider
This time, of course, the magicians have new rabbits and new hats. But it's all still illusions.
Article 16 Pure factual information broadcasted through public communication media constitutes a type of current affairs news as provided in Item 2 of Article 5 of the Copyright Law. The source of news shall be indicated when broadcasting or reporting any piece of current affairs news gathered or compiled by others.
And then my computer broke, and I didn't have a computer all summer while I was living in the Middle of Nowhere, PA, and everything was hectic, what with 3 separate moves and the whole life milestone changey changes thing, and it kind of all came down to a sort of pre-maternity leave.
So now I skip that section of the menu and indulge in the pasta instead. Fred was smart from the get go, ordering the exact same pasta dish - the Tajarin - handcut tagliatelli, 5 hour pork sugo and porcini mushrooms, on every visit. He clearly knows something that I don't because at one point I imagined that, surely, the paparadelle with braised short rib ragu and roasted chanterelles must be even better. It wasn't, of course, and so I sent its meaty, extremely rich goodness (it was good, I just couldn't eat it with a Tajarin sitting in forking distance), back to the kitchen and took a plate of what Fred was having instead. I don't know what it is about that dish, but those buttery, thin, wiggly, tender, handcut noodles with the perfect amount of meat sauce on top deliver us both 100% satisfaction. There are two sizes, $10 and $15. The $15 is too much for me and the $10 is too little for Fred. Go figure. Go order!
Even so though, Jonah boldly runs forth intending to sacrifice himself to take them out, so forced to act Lehm pulls him back and gives him a lecture that when they work they don’t do it with dying in mind, even commenting on his hatred of weapons and such. So with this knowledge passed on, he entrusts him with getting Koko away while he and Valmet hold them back, Lehm countering the elder assassin’s claim of gunfire making beautiful music by denying it. And now out of ammo Orchestra is forced to fall back, and as Lehm and Valmet make their way to the others they realise that they’ll have to separate them. By now Jonah and Koko happen to be running along the beach, Koko meeting his claim that guns make people turn into demons by relating it to the current situation.
Ukraine cannot effectively address its own massive every day domestic illicit black economy, so it has a very long way to go before it takes the time and effort to look at that of international/regional serious and organised crime without the robust encouragement of external law enforcement agencies.
Goodie bag totes -- Old Navy
Leonard Johnson came to play in this game and brought the best he had to offer against one of the best wide receivers in the game in Justin Blackmon. Standing 5-10 200 lbs. Johnson possesses a solid but not spectacular build for the position as his length isn’t anything to get too excited about but it’s good enough to get the job done. Leonard proved to be a physical/aggressive type corner who didn’t back down from the superior Justin Blackmon. Johnson did a good job pressing and re-directing Blackmon at the line of scrimmage and did a nice job of using the sidelines as an extra defender all night. He showed the ability to turn and run with Blackmon down the sidelines, although he could have done a better job getting his head around on a throw in which he was in perfect position but Blackmon simply adjusted to the underthrown ball and walked into the end zone. Johnson stays low in his back pedal/stance and displays above average to good footwork overall. Johnson also shows natural plant and drive ability, displaying loose hips and ability to change directions with relative ease. An issue I had with Johnson came when he was working against Blackmon on quick slants where he had a tendency to hook his man and get into his body before the ball had arrived, resulting in a pass interference penalty. Here Johnson has to play with more discipline, although I would say his coverage was pretty good overall and he was going against one of the best slant route runners in all of college football. Leonard Johnson was responsible for two turnovers in this game and you could tell he was very well prepared and studied, showing great hustle and effort overall. On the fumble recovery Johnson was simply in the right place at the right time, but this showed a keen awareness to never give up on the play and fight to the whistle in which he was rewarded. The other came on an interception late in the game in which he was playing off Blackmon before jumping and out positioning Blackmon for the football on a simple hitch route that was tipped at the line of scrimmage. This play showed a lot of desire as he simply out-flanked Blackmon for the ball and wanted more than the other player. As a talent evaluator I love to see this from a prospect and it definitely caught my attention in what was a huge game for Leonard Johnson to show he could hang with the best of the best. Right now I am giving Leonard Johnson an early 3rd round grade, which could improve with his performances at Combine and at all-star games leading up to the draft…he’s a player to watch.
another drug, a steriod, was prescribed.
While editing that last post I discovered just how much WordPress hates any edits that include angle brackets (even if properly changed to their HTML entities) – it even trashes other parts of the article not even close to where you made your edits. WordPress is a great blogging platform 99% of the time, but then there are those occasions that have me screaming “WordPress, you’re a $^&%^&* piece of $^$&” at the top of my lungs (and damn near popping a blood vessel). That particular article is one that apparently breaks their editor good and proper if you try to edit it.
Scientists say some radioactive cesium levels in seawater are higher farther away than adjacent to Japan’s crippled Fukushima nuclear power plant.
Jesus said in John 14:27 “Peace I leave with you, my peace I give you. I do not give to you as the world gives. Do not let your hearts be troubled.”
Deb married Randy Kalmbach at 19. They thought all they needed was love—and the possessions they could fit in their metallic blue VW bug! What they didn’t realize was how much it would take to live with adversity, disappointment and heartache. They never imagined their journey taking them into the depths of addiction with Randy battling alcoholism for almost 30 years before he experienced the miracle of sobriety.
Now, I’m not talking about singing songs either fast or slow; for that is just an expression of your worship attitude. It’s just an expression of the real thing.
What she hates even more is when people have to touch her feet. She avoided getting new sneakers for months as she didn’t want to have to try new ones. When forced to get a pedicure for my cousins wedding, she sat there mute and turned a pale colour.
Why the hell can't we do that? Why can't our governments grow some balls, explain that if even if we maintain the current pretence of freedom - genuine freedom having been sacrificed in the name of security - now and again a terrorist fucknuts will slip through anyway... but we can just as secure, far more free and way less inconvenienced if we do things like the Israelis. Obviously there's less time to spunk away your holiday money on the airport shops, but many people think airports that are more like shopping malls with runways are just another hellish facet of the nightmare that flying has become so this isn't a downside for many people.
FACTOID: Jeremy Renner was originally set to voice a role but had to bow out because of his busy schedule.
It’s important that you know exactly why you are conducting an interview and which goal(s) you are aiming for. Stay focused on questions and techniques which will achieve them.
Max was there waiting.
Let's do it.
The shop is packed with cheeses from around the globe, coming in amazing shapes and sizes, from the tiniest ashy grey geometric blocks, to pristine white smooth discs, to gigantic amber colored wheels.
completely paint in a background around the leaf. I have included several examples.
That is a YAY.
Two years ago, I’d never even have considered having to make a choice like this. Back then, I was a baby. I was in primary school, I had lots of friends, and I thought that my stepsister could solve any problem ever. I really want to give her one more chance to solve this one.
I was blessed to photograph this sweet one today... I couldn't get over her bright blue eyes!
Trying. Again. And again. And again.
Old Fitzgerald 12 years old, 45% abv
In turn, the consumer’s approval depends in large measure on the sort of container that has been designed to deliver the liquid to a set of waiting lips in a way that assure optimal freshness and quality.
When I checked, I found that it held three full episodes of another one of my favorite shows on it, the Syfy Channel’s Eureka. And, since I knew that another episode was coming that same night, I decided that it was a good time to catch up. Besides, I’d been putting off watching them since I found out this is also Eureka’s final season, and it’s silly to risk my damned DVR screwing up and losing them. Something that HAS happened before!
“Be kind whenever possible. It is always possible. “ ~ Dalai Lama
Any CAMRA member/activist who agrees with these sentiments from their founder - and I know there are many of you - will find no quarrel with me.
Individuals are entitled to a 50% reduction of the capital gains on assets held for more than 12 months. Further a number of small business capital gains tax concessions may apply to the capital gain on your home – thus reducing any potential tax liability further.
Aye me.
Permission to fight is given to those (i.e. believers against disbelievers) who are fighting them (and) because they (believers) have been wronged, and surely Allah is Able to give them (believers) victory.
About 10 years ago I was in a high school touch football team. It was one of the first times I’d ever made a school team, despite trying for several years to get in. I was very excited to be a part of the squad. At the time, I wasn’t a very good footy player. I’d played a lot of park footy, but I’d never been a part of a representative team, so I was very aware that if I stuffed up, I’d be cut pretty quickly.
Found in, Inc.Com, The Takeaway, The Fine Art of Strategic Leadership, May 2012
My main interest in checking out Samnet was for one particular area, Descriptive Video Content. What is Descriptive Video Content DVC? DVC is very similar to close captioning for the hearing impaired, but for blind people. It is a track that is set to a movie or television show that describes all the action that is going on, making it possible for a blind person to follow along. I expected to go to Samnet’s DVC area and get what I usually get not a lot of movies to choose from, and a fairly old and outdated library. Well, quite the contrary. I was pleasantly surprised to see New Release section with the label of uploaded in the last 30 days. I then went to the comedy section and was amazed that there were over a thousand movies to choose from. The movies range from classics to the latest releases. WOW. I watched my first descriptive Video movie The Ides of March with George Clooney, Phillip Seymour Hoffman, Ryan Gosling, and Paul Giamatti. It took some getting used to listening to a movie with DVC, but compared to the alternative of not watching movies at all, it is amazing.
is going to grab him? REALLY? — Bewildered Brooklynite
Let our hearts be united in fellowship strong.
“Why are you going home?” he asked.
Thank you Becca, and thank you Pam! It truly means a lot to me that you would think of me.
to make you my own.
parked nearby, and when they go to investigate they discover than a small alien was part of the meteor. It attacks the leader of the gang – Moses – before scurrying off.
664 *D-III/21/1974. “Conspiracy and American Justice.” Law Lecture Series, Rosary College, River Forest, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1979(7), above, pp. 688-715.)
Today I'm inside with poor Jack who was attacked by the nasty stomach bug last night. Oh well, tho it's sunny out it's also COLD so I'll putz at my Easter decor and maybe post some pics of that soon. This month seems to have it backwards - coming in like a lamb and going out like a lion. Stay snug friends!
Rent - £700
Something ground breaking.
Casa Pasiflora is an old traditional house, which has been renovated to provide 2 apartments with modern facilities, but still keeping much of the original character. It is beautifully situated overlooking the banana plantation and is at the end of a quiet cul de sac, with space for parking. The attractive terraces and garden make this a haven while only being a short walk from the facilities of the village.
The other message was a list of things that Jesus would have been willing to die for and it is as follows:
The result is a cleaner, easier-to-read paragraph. Just imagine if you did this to an entire manuscript--it would be much tighter and streamlined. (Example sentences and paragraph borrowed from one of my early blogposts.)
Hawkeye was a surprise since he's a "villain" half way through it. That works given his reformed nature in the comic. Jeremy Renner does a solid job with a part that doesn't really dig very deep. Hawkeye is the least developed of the lot, and that's the script not the acting.
Simonetti is adamant that he's not seeking enrichment, just a replacement car as similar as possible to the one which was stolen, something which is apparently not possible with his insurance pay-out.
My own glass is half full because :
Julian Cope is as crazy as a loon, but he has managed to crank out some great stuff over his three decades on the scene. This from the stellar Peggy Suicide
The former Hollyoaks actor, 32, was sensationally pictured last week, lying on a bed in his hotel penthouse suite with his arm around pretty brunette Katie Moores. The 26-year-old claims that Jamie kissed her on the lips and insisted he was single.
Again, history is full of catastrophic events that have caused tremendous turmoil in nations… and people who have been trapped inside with no way out have had their lives turned upside down.
Would be kind of blessing as I’d have a quiet day!!
As humans we like to think of nature, of wildlife as a lower order than mankind. Because we can easily kill and eat most species, or at least wear them if they don't taste good, we speak of denizens of the seas and forests as 'dumb animals.' Even Yogi Bear who proclaimed himself smarter than the average bear never went to college or held a job.
NEWTON, Kansas (KSN) -- A bill making it’s way through the state legislature would allow guns inside many rural Kansas courthouses and that’s concerning some lawmen who say firearms have no place inside tension-backed courtrooms.
"How do you want to paint your car?" I asked.
And love the people in our lives
A local christian radio station asked listeners to come up with a word to motivate them for 2011. I heard this as I was driving in my car and the word, restored, came to me in an instant. I was a little surprised! I think of restoration around Easter time, and during times of grief. However, God planted such a deeper plan of restoration in my mind.
Absolut Citron – 40%
CJ is a work at home mother of 3. She has been absolutely wonderful to work with and we love her products!
6They have to get a resting-place in the hollows of the valleys, in holes of the earth and rocks.
The term “popcorn flick” usually refers to a movie which one brainlessly munches popcorn to, one in which the viewer is engrossed in the action and in a real sense leaves themselves behind and become enmeshed in the world the filmmaker has created. Strangely, the term is often used in a derogatory fashion. From where I sit, it should be a high honor to be a popcorn flick.
I next cut a nice bite of the chicken-fry... oh my! I am an admitted Chicken-fried ANYTHING snob. I make pretty good chicken-fry myself and this was definitely up to my snobby standards. Light coating, moist inside. Yum. The gravy was good, the potatoes were good...between the teen and myself, we cleaned the plate, sopping up the gravy with the Texas Toast.
It’s also the state motto of Wisconsin, so unless Kristol et. al. are willing to concede that Republican Gov. Scott Walker and the state’s 6 million residents are abiding the communist/fascist threat, the attack on Obama falls a bit flat.
"But while most of the media focuses on Republican Boehner and the tea party pressures on him to raise the debt limit not one Liberty dime, Sanders' mumblings are a useful reminder that hidden in the shadows of this left-handed presidency are militant progressives like Sanders who don't want to cut one Liberty dime of non-Pentagon spending.
Then, I blended in E44. Those are the only two browns I used on the bear. After I had blended in the E44, I let the bear dry thoroughly, and I went back and darkened the deepest shadows with the E44. I added the cast shadows on his arms, on his legs, and from the flower. These needed to be crisp on the edges, and for crisp edges, let your base colors dry.
Fame will be a point which from my perspective will be phased out of this existence where there is no more specific points in our reality which get all the glory and fame, while the rest look on in adoration. So what I am looking at here is in an Equal Money System the foundation or starting point of ourselves within playing sports will no longer be to “attain fame” or to “Get the Big Paycheque” and “the life” that comes with this. Essentially in an Equal Money System we will create a system which will provide for all the lifestyle that would have otherwise been only afforded by the “Superstar”, and thus this will alleviate the drive/desire/urgency to pursue such a position.
Anyhow, our current doctor has the most amazing manner and tone. In addition to being a well-known, widely respected teaching physician, he has a way of making you feel like you (as a parent of a child with special needs) are doing a really good job with the challenges that you face. He asks lots of questions, really listens well and always finds a way to affirm us personally. (Thus, the long waits in the waiting room?) I always go away from these appointments encouraged. And this is not always the case with the other billions of doctors that we see for our son.
20The rest of the families of the children of Kohath, the Levites, were given towns from the tribe of Ephraim.
In the moment of their fullest equilibrium,
they promenade,
Then, I attempted snacks. I had bowls set out with blueberries, strawberries and banannas, for each of the featured Angry Birds. Then, a last minute idea (brilliant you could say), was to fill sandwhich bags with popcorn, tie them off and tape the white bird faces. They turned out pretty cute and were the biggest hit with the kids. Literally. They decided to throw the popcorn White Birds at the Pigs decorating the back yard. Oh well. I'm trying to let my boys be boys. A big step for me!
141 ***7. “On Art, Calculation and Dreams: Lewis Carroll, C. L. Dodgson and Their Alices.” University of Chicago Magazine, Winter 1975, pp. 26-32. (Source: Item D-I/17/1075, below. Incorporated in Item B-3, above, pp. 166-78, 442-47 (1983).)
It's a little too late cause I'm already gone
By: Emaad Iqbal
Different aspects, including quotes, are in the table below – these are between rep one and rep two:
about your sister...
Meditation is the art of opening the third eye (inner eye). You become calm, submissive, and assertive and seek stillness. Between every breath, you seek a space that is beyond this world and is somewhat closer to your guardian angel’s world. You will peace in this state of mind. In addition, while you are meditating you are much closer to your god and to your guardian angel as well. In this state of mind you can contact with your guardian angel and even communicate with him.
Until the time comes for God to send his Son, Jesus, back to get His bride, it is up to each one of us as Christians to allow others see a little glimpse of what God and his Son, Christ looks like through us . It is important that we notice God at work around us every day. The other day, my dog, Smokey slipped and wrote about God’s presence. Smokey is so very right. We must acknowledge God in all that is around us. When we acknowledge in all of our surroundings, we see the most beautiful portrait of God and his Son. We can also look in the mirror every day and see a beautiful image of God. After all, we are made in His image.
Hope you all had a fab mothers day too!
*strong adhesive for the paper or a sticker maker
This recipe was inspired by some goodies I had left in the fridge. That is not to say I used any old floppy spring onion or squashy tomato that happened to be hiding out in my veg tray, no far from it! They were in their prime and I wanted their destinies to be more than some garnish to the same old salad. So in a focaccia…sorry flash! I thought hmmm, they would be pretty tasty in some freshly baked bread. Together with some salty black olives the colours give the impression you’re well on your way to your five a day in just one chunk! Well nearly…
Take this information, protect it with your life, and put it into a file offline. Social media sites have a nasty tendency of changing accessibility rules on a whim.
This week I'm hoping to focus a little more on listing. I was battling whatever you want to call my sickness last week and it's still lingering. I started new meds yesterday and today they have me dragging. In case you missed it, its 1 cent auction day on Ebay. I'm going to try and work on listing throughout the day, but today we are having an all family nap and I guarantee I'll be the first one asleep.
The party was a total blast!
I can hardly be bothered to argue more about this. But the focus shouldn't be on the strain the older women are placing on the NHS. The focus should be on why the hell isn't anyone doing anything about adapting the NHS to meet the demands? It has long been known that there is an increasing shortage of midwives. But despite promises during election campaigns I can see no evidence of there being any changes. Many midwives do a wonderful job, but there are unfortunately far too many instances of where they aren't able to do their job as they are too busy. That's not the mothers' fault. It's the system which needs investment in training.
This includes both young and Hispanic voters, Nelsen said, noting that Obama retains a big advantage among youths, though the Republican Party has recovered some of them since 2008.
I debated whether to actually provide links to all the porn mags, but it was so easy - almost every one was the top hit on Google, not that Black Inches was a big surprise - and figured the cheap thrill trumped good taste. They're all kinda safe for work, depending on how your boss feels about your computer displaying a naked guy with a big yellow words obscuring his crotch.
for the last several months
Here's the view when you first walk in Kalia's room:
Warm the milk a bit and soak the saffron threads in them.
One question raised by Hardy’s unhinged performance – does his charisma glorify Bronson’s life and actions? Does he become less of a madman, and more of a badass? The final sequences seem to prove this idea a lie, as Refn tries to hammer home the consequences of Bronson’s life choices. Still, more so than a prison movie or a criminal caper, Bronson is something like a portrait of an artist – one who may paint in blood and write in a steady stream of “cunts”, but whose genius for violence can’t be apprehended by most of us. Which is certainly for the best.
It's been a long day and since my mom is the only person who actually reads my blog, I'm going to keep it brief.
But it seems clear that the charm of a Thai female is far more than merely physical. It involves a vivaciousness, a naturalness, a well-developed sense of humor, and, perhaps, above all, the intelligence to deal with life’s problems while maintaining an almost childlike ability to delight in living. In other words, an attitude toward life which understands that life is meant to be enjoyed. As the Thais say, “If it’s not sanuk (joyful, happy), it’s not worth doing.”
The Temple of Rejuvenation
Interestingly, this creation came from a writing challenge from my friend who suggested I try and get the words ‘banana’, ‘spring’ and ‘purple’ into my story. I spent about half an hour on these 480 words. I think I may be in a slightly odd frame of mind today….
With England on the cusp of revolution, Lucy inexplicably finds herself awakened to a world where magic and mortals collide, and the forces of ancient nature and modern progress are at war for the soul of England . . . and the world. The key to victory may be connected to a cryptic volume whose powers of enchantment are unbounded. Now, challenged by ruthless enemies with ancient powers at their command, Lucy must harness newfound mystical skills to preserve humanity’s future. And enthralled by two exceptional men with designs on her heart, she must master her own desires to claim the destiny she deserves.
Any style of beer can be made lower in strength than described in the classic style guidelines. The goal should be to reach a balance between the style's character and the lower alcohol content. Drinkability is a character in the overall balance of these beers. Beers in this category must not exceed 4.1% alcohol by weight (5.1% alcohol by volume). Original Gravity (ºPlato) 1.034-1.040 (8.5-10 ºPlato) ● Apparent Extract/Final Gravity (ºPlato) 1.004-1.010 (1-2.5 ºPlato) ●Alcohol by Weight (Volume) 3.2-4.1% (4.0-5.1%) ● Bitterness (IBU) 10-30 ● Color SRM (EBC) 2+ (4+ EBC)So when I first saw this (thanks to Chris Lohring at The Notch, who brought it to my attention), I about went ballistic. The description sounds like a category for 'dialed-down' versions of other beers -- like a 'session bock' -- a low-alc counterweight to the "Other Strong Ale or Lager" category. Except that, unlike Other Strong (and wouldn't that make a great beer name?), Session Beer not only has an upper limit on ABV -- a way too strong 5.1%! -- it has an even more WTF-inducing lower limit on ABV: 4.0%!
- Born February 25, 1943 in Liverpool England
In a skillet, saute the diced onion in the butter until tender and beginning to get golden in color.
The Lore of the Prothean’s is still important to the series and I understand that many people are unhappy with what happened to this character, but putting these things into consideration, I find it very hard to believe having this character as DLC is going to take important plot elements out of the game. I say just play the game without the DLC and then ask someone with the Collector’s Edition if the Prothean has any impact on the plot. It’s possible Prothy may have information about his race, but I doubt he will have any information that would affect the main storyline of the game.
The neighborhood is quiet and residential, Senge said, and apart from the occasional wave, neighbors mostly keep to themselves. Gilbert is a city of 208,000 southeast of Phoenix.
Closer, NIN (a perennial and forever favorite. This song IS sex.)
Triathlon events are on the rise, making it easier to compete in sprint distance races, as well as the other common distance lengths: international/olympic, half-Ironman and Ironman. What I find ironic about Ironman and Iron Girl is that both men and women are open to compete in Ironman, but only Iron Girl is available to women; not that I’m complaining.
But I promise you, the next ones will be a LOT shorter. Mainly because all the introductions were already done.
There are four types of license conditions: Attribution, Share Alike, Non-Commercial and No Derivative Works (Creative Commons). These four can be combined in numerous ways to create a license fit for each author. The author chooses to allow commercial uses of the work, modifications of the work and then decides on the jurisdiction of the license (International or a specific country). Once the user finished the form the website generates HTML code for the user to implement on their work on the Internet.
Doors open at 6:30. Play from 7PM – 11PM.
The zoo also runs different programs throughout the year and you can watch animal feedings etc. Near the entrance there is a board listing the different things going on and you can also check in at the Visitor Center. Down near the bottom of the hill is the “Kid’s Farm” and the “Pizza Playground,” both good places to explore in a different way.
and you just wanted to throw something at them and be like
“The Norwegian People’s Aid, funded by the Foreign Ministry, described Israel as “apartheid” and accused it of “war crimes.”
Nevertheless, generally, if your are a specific fan of the printing is very feasible within the other present in these shoes will be simple. Style such as “Love kill Slowly” and “Beautiful Ghost” and also the traditional Religious Audigier Tiger woods is available and can cheap swtor credits be located in a variety of colors is probably. General edition — there are a number associated swtor credits with older Erectile dysfunction Hardy handbags various style or the fundamental edition, including the unique “laceless” and I captured an additional look at the newest around the brand new style castle. This particular design has no shoelaces, easy away design, but additionally one more “layer” towards the bundle and check out the rear in position close to the front of shoes seized in the footwear. The 3rd style is “Organic” high-level version, (because somebody may guess from the name) is a footwear as well as environment-friendly dirt this look fun. Supplies — These shoes are available in the actual fabric and leather version. There might be found in some style with expensive – they are truly on your own in the buy swtor credits group arranged.
Chesterfield, MO 63017
He chose the cake form my cake books - it was the spider one out of one of the Australian Women's Weekly books, but then he made some design changes, such as no big spider and lots of other bugs stuck in the web. He also thought the web was better grey rather than black (as in the book) as this way it looked more like a web. I am happy with simple :)
He has refused to pass other Laws for the accommodation of large districts of people, unless those people would relinquish the right of Representation in the Legislature, a right inestimable to them and formidable to tyrants only.
The general track is heading ENE.. then turning ESE somewhere near Chicago / Michigan / North Indiana border area:
Ooh La Frou Frou girl Sunny
Phew, I feel better already :)
I have no control over it. Dad tells me to start meditate. But considering he's the biggest douchebag in Los Angeles I don't really want to take up anything he claims does wonders for one's mind and spirit.
Goodnight! I'm pooped!! Turnin' in early.
This colour speaks of hope and clarity – a pure, clean and unpolluted direction for the future of our planet; a chance to reclaim possibility with renewed vigour and energy – the clear new horizon of tomorrow.”
And so, my friends,
9. SECOND HIGH
Of course, it’s been so long (5 months?) since our meal at Hawksworth that I cannot remember the names of what was ordered. If you happen to know the name of any of these items, please let me know and I will add them back on. (V? B? Do you two remember?) Here’s what we ordered:
But could Elli throw her insecurities out the window and love Shea with everything inside of her? Or will she let a past relationship, and her family ruin any chance of her being happy?
I spoke for less than fifteen minutes, three of these people actually left in the middle of it, and the others turned out to be the five men who were waiting to take the platform away when I had finished. In the circumstances it is not surprising that my carefully prepared joke, about Broodie receiving big offers to star in a film, completely misfired. It was received in silence, and I was very glad, as I have already said, to start back to my own village of Beadle again.
An additional caveat: I'm not feeling 100%, and my energy flagged as I went on (this took over 2 hours to pick the outfits, put them on and photograph them, not to mention the time to write this post), so if I seem less than zippy, blame that.
Ever since women starting entering the workforce en mass, we’ve been struggling with the concept of “work-life balance”. (As though men weren’t also suffering from a lack of balance?)
I love the range of topics it covers (relationships, fashion, cooking, travel—in fact, it’s how I found the fabulous Grand Hotel Nord Pinus).
If you have hypertensive relatives, it’s likely that your genetic make-up puts you at risk for high blood pressure at some point in the future. So be vigilant about staying fit (exercising thirty minutes a day, five to seven days a week), watching your salt intake and keeping your weight under control. These preemptive strikes will help you best avoid hypertension down the road – or at very least, delay its onset.
LORD OF THE RINGS: It's all completely humourless and is desperately in need of Brian Blessed SHOUTING LIKE HE DID IN FLASH GORDON. "HAWKMEN,DIIIIIIVE!" (When he was in his patrol car in Z Cars did he shout: "POLICEMAN, DRIIIIIVE!"?)
Still, on the plus side, I do know what I was doing this very day 34 years ago (and oddly, 1977 works the same as 2011, so the 31st of Jan was a Monday too)... yes, I can confirm we had art with Mr Jones, and I watched Batman when I got home. Nuggets like that would be lost if it weren't for the likes of me and Pepys.
The sun actually peeped out from behind the clouds today. That, combined with the fact I was having lunch with wonderful friends was enough to get me in a frock.
Designers work on deadlines. We are deadline people, never say “oh, whenever you have time.” We need to know when to have each step completed, we need to know when we are meeting. Most designers work on multiple contracts at a time. Most designers will sit down with you and create a schedule.
Sunday the 2nd of November
You've seen bits and pieces of it coming together. But since the inspector just signed off on it (I know it took us awhile...only because it took us awhile to remember to call him!) it seems fitting to do the reveal. We did everything ourselves, except for the plumbing + drywall. Sources are listed at the bottom of this post. This is what we started with as we rebuilt the bathroom. This photo is actually a few steps into the process, having replaced the plumbing under the house, new concrete floor, new walls, insulating etc. etc. But it's a starting off point...
The bottom drawer holds all of my punches:
So . . . I guess that means that I’m either pondering the idea of selling everything and living the simple life in a small wood retirement village off the beaten path—or, perhaps I’m sensing the energetic rush of spiraling up and up as I see myself fly into the higher reaches of nature—out into a profound oneness with all of creation. Wow! That’s a lot to think about. On the other hand, maybe our little discovery today is urging me to simply continue walking back home, to sit in that patch of sun in the back yard by the tree, sipping some hot tea while I watch the birds flit about.
Withholding is another form of denying. Withholding includes refusing to listen, refusing to communicate, and emotionally withdrawing as punishment. This is sometimes called the “silent treatment.”
Still decent, will tune in:
He is represented holding a letter A in his right hand, a nod to his invention of a printing press.
My mother returned home last night, and was driven back from the station by a friend. The journey went smoothly, but sadly they did hit a hare on the way back. The hare, fortunately, was killed outright and the friend, having stopped to check that it was dead and to observe a proper moment of sadness at the passing of such a magical and beautiful creature, then popped it in the boot to hang it for the pot.
R 1: * ch 7, sc in ring. Repeat from * 9 times. Join with sl st in base of first loop.
Live the good life in this gorgeous 2BR/2BA condo in the heart of Old Town. This unit features 42″ cherry cabinetry and granite countertops in the kitchen. Brazilian cherry hardwood flooring in living and dining rooms and kitchen. 10′ ceilings, faux-finished walls plus in-unit washer and dryer. Step out on your 13th floor east-facing balcony for some truly stunning skyline views. This luxury building boasts a 24-hour doorman, exercise room and rooftop deck plus a 5th floor garden. Garage parking is included. This is a true walkers paradise with everything so close!
WARNING: Spoilers ahead! So don’t read past this if you don’t want to be, umm, spoiled.
It’s like she’s too tired to eat, and too hungry to sleep. I wake her, encourage her. Cajole.
Almost everyone knows someone in the family that is good with remodeling and should ask this person for help or at least a few pointers. This includes friends, neighbors, and family members alike. All you have to do is have a conversation with someone with experience in this area. Both failures and success stories can be useful. Most of the time, the contractor will be able to give you the information, good or bad, that you need about certain people that could help you on your project. The next best thing to talking to people locally is to check out some websites and forums where people discuss their experiences with home improvement. Information that will help you with your project typically can come from a simple conversation with someone you know.
So, the man of God went with the older prophet and ate and drank in his home. But while they ate, God’s word came to the older prophet saying that, because the man of God had disobeyed God in returning to eat and drink, he would be devoured by a lion on his way back. When the young prophet left with his ass, he was met on his way by a lion which slew him according to God’s word. What does this teach us? We should fear and respect God, obey his instructions only, and not that of men, no matter whom they are. In the long run, we would be responsible to God, and so we must confirm every instruction that affects our lives from him ourselves, and be fully persuaded. Despite his own role in the events, the old prophet was not judged, but the young one who received instructions initially from God was.
Are you the sort of person who checks out other people’s bookshelves?
Pray for the small details that have to get worked out.
Their cover is 100% perfection. It reminds me of why I love this song so much... "Sweetness" is really kind of effortlessly perfect.
When I met and spoke with the PF coaches, it became clear to me that they're more a fitness movement than a gym membership business venture (they do offer personalized training sessions for individuals, groups, and corporate accounts though).
There is also nothing more frustrating to a buyer than a sales person who does not pay attention to specifics through the sales process. Trust me, you do not want to tune out at the wrong time during a sale only to find out you missed something vital to the sale itself. There aren’t many ways you can lose credibility faster than having the buyer repeat themselves or worse yet, make them feel like you are not paying attention to them. Think back to the introduction section where we talked about developing the perfect pitch. Paying attention is a big part of perfecting your pitch. Making your buyer feel like they are the most important person in the room is a great way to increase your odds of closing the sale.
If you have any leftover pumpkin, sweet potato or butternut squash, why not turn it into a quick pasta sauce? I took 1 c pumpkin puree, 1 c white beans, vegetable stock. roasted garlic, nutritional yeast, chipotle and lime juice to make this almost mexican style mac and hmmmm, I'm not sure I'd call it cheese, but let's just say yummy sauce! I drizzled a bit of olive oil over the top and finished it off with cilantro. Basil would have been delicious too.
Now, I know that a lot of people don’t like you to feed the wild birds, but I love animals and when those itty bitty little eyes look at me and my sandwich, well, I just can’t resist. And besides I wasn’t the first, because they knew just how to beg for the best result. I must admit that the sparrows, pigeons, starlings, squirrels and ducks in the nation’s capital our very well behaved. There is no pushing or shoving and they all patiently sat there waiting their turns. There was none of the stealing and squawking the seagulls on the boardwalks are known to do…. they were sweet.
The Gravedigger's Song by Mark Lanegan Band
I feel like there are a million things running through my head right now but for some reason I am not really able to put them into logical thoughts that can be written out. I’m sure that’s from the stress of it all and from being exhausted. It doesn’t help either that we are leaving for the appointment in just seven short hours and I still haven’t gotten to sleep.
Mile 3: Tha’s a lot of hills
Sprinkle the venison with salt and pepper and add to the pan. Brown well on all sides, about 3-4 minutes per side (more if you want it cooked more). Remove from pan and keep warm.
Our own little slice of heaven in Taize.
a tiny knifepoint of cayenne
“Hrm… Quiddick sounds like a good move.”
6 eggs. Those eggs would later be used
Mellie couldn’t answer.
Library statistics can not be changed unless libraries change. Libraries can not be changed unless communities, users and educational institutions change. But this is hardly a problem. Our environment is changing before our eyes.
This usually results in drinking a lot of water and finding an often-nasty-tasting pill still securely in your mouth.
His Insects of New Holland is based on specimens collected by Joseph Banks and the astronomer William Bayly on the second and third voyages of James Cook, specimens in the collection of entomologist Dru Drury, and other private collections as well as his own museum. It is the first publication dealing exclusively with the insects of Australia.
There were many more wonderful moments during the conference but this post is already way too long and I don't want to bore all of you anymore. All I can say is that if you haven't gone to an SCBWI annual conference yet, don't miss it. It will be an experience that you'll never forget.
The session started benignly as I was given an overview of the new salary structure. There was a range and a mid-point and something about skill sets, which prompted me to give a knowing nod. Next he moved on to a new data collection model he was obviously proud of, which showed how many pages I had processed in the previous year. “Hmm,” I observed, which I count as — at most — half a word. Then I heard there’d be some vaguely defined departmental reorganization in the coming months, which I hoped included cleaning out the refrigerator. “Uh-huh,” I said. Hyphenated perhaps, but one word, tops.
It won’t be easy. At times I’ll feel like being lazy. This is a day-to-day journey, and I’m using this blog as a means of accountability. I plan on using this blog to post photos of myself as I go along, chart my progress, keep track of my achievements, and (hopefully) inspire others.
For the rest of the duration of his commute,he makes do with just looking at her and doing all the homework in his head.Not so when she was getting out of the train.He made a face, a convincing one for his non-existent discomfort, and pressed his body against her as she picked her carry bag up from the floor,aligning his face with her back.His entire body thrummed alive with the rush,her proximity making him go wobbly and high and light-headed.His orgasmic ordeal was punctuated only by her exit,allowing him to catch his breath.
Their father shook his head slowly, as though chasing away a thought. "That's not how it's done."
I had fun making the meal. I always enjoy a challenge and we even made Resurrection Rolls..they are always a big hit with everyone.
The healing process for any abused person takes a lifetime.
(Just to clarify, I'm not disparaging my friends, and I'm not referring to anyone in particular, I'm rather highlighting what I consider to be an unfortunate phenomenon.)
We spent the night at the Dry Creek State Recreation Area, a no frills campground that was nearly empty. Aside from one couple who were tent-camping a few sites over, and piles of moose scat everywhere, the campground was deserted. But it suited our needs just fine and we got a good night's sleep.
me: that's right!! its jesus' birthday! do you know why i think jesus' birthday is so important to celebrate?
Now I have to say my Grandson isn’t even 2 yet … he will be at the end of this month, but I already have plenty of boy 2 year old cards so I am getting in an earlier start for next year. I will need some for Christmas when I give my cards away to family and friends.
Anjolee: It’s fun to sweat it out.
Seed choices, best may be heal seeds. Int can help with your tapping should you so choose, but does NOT help with healing. Agility is still probably a waste unless particularly want get speed-related gear. Resistance seeds if you have the emblems to spare and think you will pvp often, but healing warlock aren't usually a norm in pvp (Not that they are necessarily bad for it, just uncommon).
Voice-Acting: 4/5 – There aren’t a lot of characters but they are all extremely mellow and decent. Not breath-taking but I don’t think the setting is supposed to be breath-taking. While Hotaru’s voice (Sakura Ayane) isfairly plain, Gin’s (Uchiyama Kouki) is very serene, complementing the soft atmosphere.
1. Full name:
I’ve always known I’m lucky. Especially when it comes to family and friends.
It's April. The swallows are just in from Africa, and soon the whales and basking sharks will be back in the Sound. If I want to, I can spend all day watching the sea (and have, on many occasions). Later, the red deer may appear on the skyline, and the hares will be feeding below in the meadows.
Either way, we tailor made our style to fit YOU. So don't hesitate to contact us for that FREE TRIAL for your wedding makeup.
Currently, for the first time in many years, Josh sleeps through the night more often than not. . . and when he wakes up, he's usually pretty content to hang out in bed. In other words, my sleep is not horrible. My life is becoming more and more "not in crisis". We are slowly moving out of just surviving. There is a little bit of margin here and there, especially since the girls are in preschool.
P.S. Be sure to enter my giveaway celebrating my near 200 followers :) It's out of this world! Win IMMORTAL RULES, Masque, and more! ♥ It's also absolutely INTERNATIONAL (granted The Book Depository ships to your country!) Click the button below to enter!
2. Wash the tomatoes, half and cut out the point where the stem enters the tomato (Call me superstitious but I was always told to do this as if tomatoes are treated using pesticides then this is where the chemicals enter). Chop into chunky slices and then half again till you have bite sized chunks.
Well, maybe the pot of gold at the end of the rainbow, but you know what I mean ~
join Susan for a fun workshop where she will show us how to use market research tools to take our business to...
How I launder: I toss into a cold water wash, let the machine agitate 5 times, turn off and let sit for a half hour. Drain out the wash water, fill with rinse (add softener if desired), let agitate 5 times, turn off and let sit for another half hour, drain, and spin. Remove from the washer and toss in the dryer with 3 tennis balls. Dry on gentle, checking from time to time between biting finger nails. The chenille looks really bad when it comes out of the wash, but something magical happens in the dryer.
Step 4: Give your email address.
It was especially hot outside, so I decided to indulge in a Coke Slushy. Unfortunately, there were no Slushies to be found. Instead, the whirling mass of partially frozen liquid now had a sign labeling it as an “Icee.” What the heck is an “Icee“? I wondered. I was beginning to feel overwhelmed by the challenges of modern transformative change, much like that first day at work after the new global computer system was installed, except thirstier.
Nellie sent this card to Harry in Redfield, New York in 1909 with a message that reads:
I coach #2.
The third question Genevieve asks is “Why do you think people are so quick to dismiss theories?”
Expect to find clothes and accessories by cool up and coming Scandinavian and British designers at POP, as well some more established brands, and a bijou selection of vintage and second-hand designer goods. I am privileged to be amongst some of the top fashion bloggers and industry fash-pack to be invited to a press evening Friday 4th of May at the store.
Monday night I walked into the meeting. I'd run into (almost literally) one of the guys from the track on my way in. And we walked into a room full of men in black coats. I don't remember actually seeing a woman in the room at that point. Later I looked around and saw a few other women. By the time the called us up to sign up for our numbers I knew there were at least 8 other women in the room. I ended up with number 8 and a woman behind me in line was waiting for number 10. In total 38 women ran the race.
Felix the questions he was being asked.
BN stepped up their game by stooping into the level of sewer politics against PR leaders, especially Anwar Ibrahim, who has been the target of many vicious attacks. It was alleged BN saw fit to implicate him in one sex scandal after another in their efforts, to topple him and finish off his political career in order to wreck PR’s chances in the coming 13th General Election.
Buy a coffee/cappuccino machine and make it at home rather than purchasing it on the way to work/school/etc.
The winner will receive a $25 Gift Certificate to The Robin’s Nest On-Line Store!
21And there fell upon men a great hail out of heaven, every stone about the weight of a talent: and men blasphemed God because of the plague of the hail; for the plague thereof was exceeding great.
"It's someones birthday today - but whose special day is it? Time to make a card and a cake, and get the party ready. And with Belle and Boo there's always a surprise, or two!"
lots of fresh black pepper
To be honest I’m struggling to recall a single handbag. There were quite a few pairs of shoes, standing self-consciously in the middle of the room in a big glass display cabinet. There was also something about Princess Diana. Did she like hats? Yes, maybe that was it.
Since it all started with the whistleblower hinting at http://blog.m3.com/Retraction, I asked him for more links to complement my findings. Here is what I had failed to notice with regard to the above articles:
Duration: 1 minute (1/minute)
as God continues to bless
Can speak the words on your lips
The original recipe was based on 21st Amendment's Back in Black IPA, and was shared with Phil Lowry, then of Saints & Sinners brewery who produced, Military Intelligence, the oxymoronic IPA.
Over the year, tweeting with Scots lawyers @loveandgarbage and @PeatWorrier – which can be a (pleasingly) surreal experience – I have started to take a keen interest in Scots Law and, from there, the writings of many good Scots law bloggers from the very experienced practitioners and academics to the keen and knowledgeable law students…
Merry Christmas and Happy Holidays to everyone!! Thank you all so very much for taking time to read my blog and for your kind comments. I hope that your holidays are filled with warmth, peace and happiness. So, how will you spend this holiday season? Will acts of charity be a priority for you?
penny plus interest, we demand the permanent abolishment of INTERNAL
The annual list is based on the newspaper's estimates of the minimum wealth of Britain's richest, with the valuations carried out at the beginning of the year.
Celia is hired as a magician in the circus, and Marco is the assistant of the circus owner. The circus is their playing field.
those engaged in the fields of Alcohol and Drug
. . . Paradoxically, it was God who saved Christopher Hitchens from the Right. Nobody who detested God as viscerally, intelligently, originally and comically as C. Hitchens could stay in the pocket of god-bothered American Conservatism for long. When he bared his fangs and went for God’s jugular, just as he had previously fanged Henry Kissinger, Mother Teresa and Bill Clinton, the resulting book, God Is Not Great, carried Hitch away from the American Right and back towards his natural, liberal, ungodly constituency. He became an extraordinarily beloved figure in his last years, and it was his magnificent war upon God, and then his equally magnificent argument with his last enemy, Death, that brought him “home” at last from the misconceived war in Iraq.
Kale, Redbor — California
The building: a 210,000 sq ft, 15-storey with three additional basement levels office building on Barrow Street in the Grand Canal Dock area of Dublin 2 (central Dublin). Architecturally it’s more lines than curves and occupies a broadly triangular footprint. At 67 metres, it is Dublin’s tallest commercial building. The tallest building in Ireland is the Cork’s 71-metre Elysian Tower which is mixed residential/commercial.
lifting with your legs this
Contrary to what Ms. Pelosi and her ilk are suggesting, no one is trying to ban contraception. But why on earth should someone else be responsible to pay for it? Or a Catholic university? Or their insurance company? Barbara Boxer had a chart of all the other things that those nasty Republicans were going to take away from poor women as well. She made the leap (Is there any logic left in this country?) that because Republicans don't want the American taxpayer to pay for contraception, they won't want to pay for the health needs of a diabetic woman. She lumped all issues that could possibly pertain to women into one category. How do they get away with tactics like this? It's absolutely ridiculous, but they can be very loud and very persistent. And pretty soon, if you don't agree with them, you've fallen short of their approval - and who can possibly live with that? Who dares actually exercise common sense.
back to revising. four exams to go! ahh.
Even when she was little, Casey—a.k.a. Praying Mantis—knew she was going to be an entomologist. And what about Jess? Casey told her to run, so she became a runner, and Casey dubbed her “Dragonfly.” They were best friends forever. But now Casey has been arrested for murder. Of course it’s a mistake. Stephanie Grass was the brattiest kid at camp; Casey and Jess weren’t the only counselors who complained about her. Sure, Casey used to joke aboust killing the kid, but she wasn’t serious.While the whole town takes sides and waits for the trial, Jess finds herself the center of attention. Everyone wants to know what happened that summer. They are hanging on every word. But does anyone really care about Jess? Mostly she finds it hard to sit still; late at night she rides her bike aimlessly up and down the town’s streets. The truth is, without Casey, Jess feels left behind. And she doesn’t like it one bit.
But there’s three pointing back
Have a super duper fun weekend! Ben’s been out of town since Saturday (in Austin, TX) so I’m excited he’s coming home tonight! YAY!!!
A special guest:
Locke wonders if everything went alright; did Widmore see Sayid. Sayid mentions Widmore's people saw him.
And you know what’s better than chocolate? Boggy Creek arugula. I’m not kidding. Either on Saturday morning or Wednesday morning, get your buns in your car (or on your bike) and head over to the east side to get you some. If you haven’t been to this small farm, you have to indulge yourself. Take the kiddies, too, if you got’em. The produce is still warm from the sun and there are some free samples of different stuff to nibble. Lovely chicken coop and a tempting sand pile, too. It’s all I can do to keep from eating a whole pile of the veggies before I can get them in the fridge. Please go. It’s local. It’s fresh. It’s supportive.
We had lots of options for New Year's Eve-see a giant Peeps chicken drop or a crayon. Not many people could say that.
10) KPIs for sustainability achievements – What indicators to use, how many are sufficient?
"Exactly. Maybe they had some kind of business going. I don't know."
Lots of folks know about the sting effort to attempt to get Eric Holder’s Ballot without I.D. While these revelations are important, I go back to a post I did back in January with an update. A foreign Company, based in Spain, with ties to Obama is the leading election software providers with their servers in Spain.
Inks - Memento Tuxedo Black, Copics, Ranger Walnut Stain
The individual components of a database must have autonomous informative value (Fixtures Marketing). Generic lists of teams, dates, and times cannot be regarded as genuinely ‘informative’, ‘only the set of details identifying each individual match can have such value.’ However, the AG did not rule out the possibility that there could be circumstances in which important significance would be added to the existing data by entering them into a database. This would be ‘arrangement of contents’ which is properly protected by database copyright—and which the database ‘adds’ to the data.
“Go out with me.”
I found the envelopes in the gift bag section at Michaels. I think they were $3 for 25. I cut numbers with my Silhouette but you could use stamps or any number stickers you have on hand. Hole punch the top and string them all together. Tuck in a card with an act of service to do each day, and you are ready to count down the days to Christmas!
Ligia 04:15
comrades and start a group blog!
The new gallery show, "Shades and Scripts," will open as well as performances by Jamaar Wallace, Alyssa Cox and the Happy Medium between 6-9 p.m. Goodness Gracious Me, Prieta, The Kelps and Music Charis will perform between 9 p.m. to 1:30 a.m. The theme is '20s speakeasy so costumes are encouraged.
The first ones arrived in 1903 -- the bittereinders who refused to cede to British rule -- and looked out at the barren horizon on a cold June afternoon. Many couldn't believe this was their new land, bleak sandstone cliffs rising sheer from the icy Atlantic.
After nine years of being sick his wife died. A year later he married the love of his life, Jean Locke (allegedly related to Rob Roy which delighted Doyle). He loved his life, his wife, and their children. A couple years later he wrote his next commercially successful series, The Lost World, with the outrageous and larger than life hero, Professor Challenger. He wrote four more novels with Professor Challenger. I think he had a lot of fun with the humorous professor and his adventures. Plus, like with Sherlock, they were wildly popular with his fans and brought in a good amount of money.
History that date back to Vol. 2, published in 1899.
"Hi out there, can y'all hear me?"
Flash mobs bearing anti-Lynas placards and Bersih 3.0′s “Duduk Bantah” banners have been mushrooming in and around Miri, Sibu and Kuching in the run-up to tomorrow’s rally.
AND SO I OFFER THIS PRAYER.
- Heat oil in a medium pot and add in the ground pork mixture. Sauteed until lightly brown.
I was at a dinner last night with some friends of mine. They are upper middle class people that are well educated. I was struck dumbfounded several times at things that came out of their mouths. I guess I was just under the silly impression that an education would provide you the skills to be able to intelligently discuss pros and cons of difficult topics like politics and the economy. Instead, all I heard was stuff they had doubtless heard from their own country club friends: Obama faked his birth certificate…black people are bad…the government is spending too much money. I am still dumbfounded.
Now, anyone else in this situation would probably go "Oh congrats!", "When is it due?" or "Do you have any names yet?". Not this kid. No, my first reaction was laughing even harder into my drink, turning back to the two of them and saying "Pfft, good one". Kat looked at me and said in the same tone as before "No, seriously I am...". Seeing her expression and Sigmas awkward gaze between the two of us I then realized she wasn't kidding. The straw that I had been playing with fell from my mouth. Mind blank, I turned away and looked straight ahead. Not really knowing what to say I did the only thing I thought was sensible, I got out of my Tank and walked down the street to a pole while muttering somethings about happy dinosaurs. Don't even bother trying to figure that one out, I don't know why I did it myself.
DiS: Valtari seems to consist of a lot more atmospheric soundscapes than its most recent predecessor. Was it a deliberate attempt on the band's part to evoke the ambiance of () or Agaetis Byrjun?
Here the boy laid his head against his grandfather’s knee and became silent. The grandfather, softly placed his hand on the boy’s raven hair and said, “And then what happened?”
9)If you tweet about this giveaway you get one extra entry and this can be done once a day for an extra entry! Make sure to include a link to the giveaway as well as @thegiveawaydiva
But, as he says, a hop and skip
The kit PKD-DK0865-500GB includes an 8 CH H.264 standalone DVR with 500GB HD and eight night vision outdoor security cameras providing everything you need to have your surveillance system up and running in your home or business quickly and easily.
The mat has been cut from an offcut of Cloud Nine paper from Fiskars and I used a strip of white card, punched with a Fiskars border punch and cut a strip of the striped paper that is from the same Cloud Nine baby girl pack. The ribbon is self adhesive and I used and embroidered pink bow from my stash. The 2 hearts and the sentiment are gel stickers.
The last part of the middle ear is the stirrup bone, which is linked to the cochlea by a membrane. The mechanical vibrations in the middle ear are sent on to the liquid in the inner ear by this connection.
So from this (found it using Google Image search - keyword "quatrefoil"):
The rest of the night was uneventful. I woke up a couple of times to find Xander doing some kind of push up in his sleep. I replaced the famed pacifier and he relaxed and went back to sleep. At 6:00 in the morning, Eddie woke us up and gently took Xander apart piece by piece. The boy was tired, but happy.
For Valentine's day dinner, I made something completely unromantic. It was Yakisoba (Japanese fried noodle). I wanted to make something more romantic but I had to use some of the vegetables in the fridge and Yakisoba was the perfect choice for using all the vegetables in my fridge.
I hope these ideas were helpful and has you thinking about ways to help fight ALS. These fundraising events can occur anytime throughout the year so don’t feel pressured to get it organized and done today. Every penny counts and is greatly appreciated.
for only one take, it was OK.
To begin, let’s stop going to war in the Middle East. We invaded Afghanistan in 2001 and Iraq in 2003. A short, intense bombing mission temporarily drove al Qaeda from its haven and it found a new one in Pakistan, including a safe home for bin Laden. We deposed Saddam Hussein, a major troublemaker in the region, and should have come home. We have little to show for the lives sacrificed and the money spent in both ventures. Billions have been squandered in both nations.
Life rarely goes according to our plans, I know that most of all. But I wish, just once, that it would go according to my plan, that my life would turn out how I want it to be, that I would win, just this once. I feel like I don’t know anything anymore.
Driving home, I picked up a puppy so Elizabeth has some company while I’m at work. She hasn’t named the little Shih Tzu yet. He is mostly white and fluffy.
It is a surprise I am alive to-day.
Anyway, apart from the odd mistake I’ve made, I’m actually really quite happy at how this turned out and believe this is my best portrait yet, which gives me hope that my next one will be even better! Hope you enjoyed the picture and if you’re on DeviantART I would really appreciate your comments or favourites! Thanks! http://xx-k1mb3rl3y-xx.deviantart.com/art/Katy-Perry-299160029
bowling
Ah, screenplays. No wonder your written dialogue is excellent. What stage are you at, currently, in your journey toward publication? And--how is that going for you? Has anything surprised you about this stage?
Fyne Ales' Jarl beer was originally launched as a seasonal beer to an expectant audience at the brewery's beer festival in June 2010. Since then it has become one of the their biggest selling beers and has gained an ever growing legion of fans won over by the delicious fresh citrus fruitiness and thirst quenching bite in this 3.8% single hopped (citra) golden ale. It is a great beer and one of my tip top favourites.
There is an urgent need for more pre-K and kindergarten space in District 15 and across the city. Kindergarten is not mandatory in New York State. Since first grade is mandatory, all children are accepted into their zoned schools, but this is not true for kindergarten.
(To be specific, the 1929 bank is 512 feet tall, while the "Miss Brooklyn" tower, as proposed, would be 620 feet.) "If you go toward that way, contextually, it’s going to work. If you go this way, contextually, it’s a problem." It wasn't clear exactly where he was pointing, but note that the Pacific Street branch of the Brooklyn Public Library, the first Carnegie Library in Brooklyn, is just across Pacific Street from Site 5, currently the home of P.C. Richard/Modell's, where a 430-foot tower is planned. (Image from Brooklyn Public Library.)
Sure Man United have just released debts of 600 million, doesn't seem right.
Rating: 1/5 One egotistical Hockey Player plus One small town Irish Lass equals One bored reader…
The frog did not understand that question and did not reply also. Finally it turned out...That the winner was DEAF!!!! He told " I saw you all that you were encoraging me by waving your hands to reach the top...so I was able to reach there..."
I wish I could express to you how wrong the green island looked in our kitchen. (I took pictures with my phone but I’ve since updated to a new one and they didn’t transfer!) If we lived in a beach house – adorable. In a funky, colorful house, perfect. In our traditional house full of warm colors – just wrong. ;) I’m sure it was the tone of that color I picked out that made it look so goofy, but I wasn’t going to try any more. I was done.
We have a new challenge starting today over at Teddy Bo and the theme is Button It! It's a phrase that's used lots in our house as tall child suffers appallingly from verbal diarrhoea lol!
Yet natural selection can cause significant change in as little as eight generations, at least in nonhuman species. In humans, it has altered at least 7% of the genome over the last 40 thousand years, and most of that change has happened over the last 10 thousand years (Hawks et al., 2007).
Nobody's Fault But Mine
It didn’t start to impress me until the scene when Sam (Dooley Wilson) performs “Knock on Wood,” when I realized that the first seventy minutes here make up for the most fluid musical ever made. Two or three scenes of dialogue between songs in the right mix for the genre. And when the songs happen, Sam or the other performers have the same spotlight on them but they’re integrated with the bar/saloon’s patrons. Other musicals would have the performer and his spotlight dominating the screen, either forcing an externalized manifestation of their inner thoughts or the performer altering the world around him. It’s a kind of cheat that this ‘musical’ takes place in an environment where one can hear music but it’s more natural and we’re all the better for it.
So to the Tories. I liken them to the Church of England. They liberalise and lose support. So they liberalise a bit more, and lose a but more support and so on. Cameron couldn't win a general election when Gordon Brown was Prime Minister, I doubt he could win one even with Miliband leading the Labour Party.
Ps: Many thanks for the support and kindness shown to me during the past year by the small, yet cherished, band of blogger chums who knew what was going on. I'll probably never adequately express how much it has meant to me. x
Works never done
I'm entering this card into the Lili of the Valley "Love Is In The Air" Challenge. Find out more about their challenge here.
Everyday when I would come home in the past, my cat would greet me at the door making sure to mark me as her human as I walked through the living room. When I come home now, I can hear my puppy jump and play even before I open the door to see her. She jumps up and down and plays with me as if it is our first day of being together. Wanted. It makes me smile, and I am grateful for that feeling. At night, my cat curls up and sleeps next to me. Wanting to be next to her human. Wanting. So nice.
I've just started couponing, but this small victory makes me want to keep going and going!!
1 mini sized Hershey's bar(we've used bite size twix, snickers, etc.)
I thought about posting right away, but I thought I would wait until I knew it would stick. I was so worried about another chemical pregnancy. I got a positive when I was about 3w5d and then took tests everyday for about 7 days to make sure they were getting darker, which they were. Thank goodness for those internet cheapies! Then I decided to wait to post the good news until our u/s at 6w2d. We were measuring pretty exact to my dates, within a day. Nice strong hb of 128. Since then I've just been too scared that if I post the news, then something bad will happen and I'll have to write another post about how I lost the baby. Stupid, huh?
But four current and former cleaners and handymen said the home renovations took place on weekends from as early as 2000 through 2009 and included electrical, plumbing and roof work, cabinet-making, painting and plastering.
TRACEY MOFFATT: I do think Tracey Moffatt has done much more interesting, amusing and moving works with her Found Film montages. They “go somewhere, and say something”. In New York there is about to be a Tracey Moffatt Film Retrospective at the Museum of Modern Art with a Public Talk by Tracey at 7pm on May 7th. Her quite rare and clever public appearances are usually “performances” not to be missed! It has been fascinating watching her career unfold, and she entirely deserves this extraordinary honour, and Australia should be very proud of her.
This week, remind yourself that the “whatayagonnado” is at your full disposal. Use it as you see fit.
A while back, I saw these cheesecake bites on Tessa's blog and pinned them right away. From then on, every time I looked at my pins for dessert inspiration, I would see those cheesecake bites staring me down. I was just waiting for all of the right ingredients to be in my house at the same time- we often have cream cheese and graham crackers, but not always at the same time. That perfect storm finally happened in my kitchen this weekend and I couldn't wait to try this recipe.
On January 19, 2009 I was driving north on I 95 near Jacksonville, Florida when Trooper Howard was wrongly advised by the U.S. Secret Service that I was a potential assassin of the new president and had a van full of weapons. I was made aware of this information on January 21st by way of a reliable confidential informant in the federal government.
They know where it's at
Religion is at the heart of an interesting memoir by Mary Johnson, An Unquenchable Thirst, ($32.95, Bond Street Books, an imprint of Random House Canada). At age 17 Mary Johnson saw a picture of Mother Teresa, founder of the Missionaires of Charity, and was so moved by it that she entered a convent in the South Bronx to begin her training. From a typical Texas teenager she was transformed by her quest for meaning in her life, for an identity. She became Sister Donata and rose through the ranks of the order to find herself working with Mother Teresa. All along the way, however, she had to wrestle with her own desire for love and a deeper personal connection to a life with faith. In 1997 she left the order after twenty years and has become a respected teacher and public speaker.
He was terribly lucky, of course. The television adaptation is brilliant. It's better than the book. He was allowed to put bits in. He was allowed to do the ending, for example, which wasn't in the book. It is absolutely super, and I still look at it and admire it. I think his later books... are not so good. However, nice chap, and Len Deighton's a super chap, too. What stopped me reviewing was meeting everybody, meeting people – not these two, but others – who I thought were delightful but I didn't like their books much!
I saved as much of the gift wrap as I could this time and here is a card that I did using those. The wreath that I have used in the picture was used as a gift tag for one of the gifts and I just loved and it will be hung in my craft room now.
If, on the other hand, the world just keeps on running, then you owe me everything you have. Everything. Every dollar, every car, every stick of furniture, every candy bar in your pantry, every bible you have will belong to me.
Amazing and a great memory.
There are tons of Jewelry techniques I'd love to learn, pretty much you name it and I'd love to learn it! But beyond learning them the challenge is finding the time to actually do them!
It was Elijah!
Wildwyck County is home to many interesting characters, some of whom can assist investigators seeking to uncover the ‘Wyck’s mysteries. Other parties will do their best to thwart such inquires, resorting to cold-blooded murder if necessary. Alistair Philips is one of the more friendly faces PCs embarking on a campaign set in Wildwyck County might encounter. His voluminous correspondence with friends, acquaintances, and the curious could serve as both an introduction to the mild-mannered historian and draw investigators living in other places to the lands along the Hudson River.
I have mentioned in these blogs before – but I cannot remember when – that I may be the ideal comedy audience because I can sit through a superb show with great gags rolling on like overlapping waves for an hour and yet, two minutes after leaving the venue, I cannot remember any of the jokes at all.
So, to wrap it up: J was very intrigued by a bilingual French/German typewriter repair instruction manual, and I was fixated on the Smith Premier, so we bargained with the seller to get them both for CHF 50. A bit more than I wanted to spend on a typewriter, but I've been having a dry spell and feeling generous, plus I appreciated the seller's friendliness and I was thrilled to find myself surrounded with all this fantastic typewriter history.
“Cheong-Jones!” I exclaimed, as he strove to escape my long-armed grip. “There’s no point struggling, my hand is like a vice on your collar! Never again will your lizard-like tongue moisten the innocent flesh of a ticket-paying customer!”
Church number 2 is a church that I already know two families at from our homeschool group. My issues with this church are smaller. The first being they are currently without a pastor, not that a pastor makes a church, but he can make a difference in a church. The other issue is more that my husband doesn't love this church. I could probably settle here if he felt comfortable.
A serious study guide designed for the Montessori classroom, this program includes over 70 pages that include single pages for drills and tracing, large characters for tracing, and other material that your child can begin using intuitively and easily.
‘I think you pitched your film exactly right: the sort of people who are going to gravitate toward The Halsteadarian’s aesthetic are the same people who’ve trained their attention spans to take in a lot of worldbuilding, fantasy mechanics, multi-threaded backstories, etc. Really, the production values are a big part of what sells the movie for me. It’s obviously a low-to-no-budget independent film but you made all these huge, in-your-face style choices, and every one of them works tone-perfectly for your neo-Victorian weird tale of a script. It’s an epic noir folk-legend fever dream. From Mars. On a stick.’ (S. Couchman 2011)
Lukewarm naan
The story of Jesus is a very beautiful one. It is the story of the God of all gods who had a change of heart towards mankind and it's during this change of heart that He decided He would change the way things were, for the better, once and for all. Knowing that only the blood of the most powerful God could save mankind from unworthiness and judgment, He sent His Son into the world for the human race in an effort to show He would sacrifice His own Son if it meant the eternal pardon of mankind from unworthiness and judgment, and on His Son's flesh and bone, were embedded all the pitfalls and downfalls of mankind. By His Son's blood, all sin was dismissed, for all time. The veil separating God from man was torn and from that day on, mankind has never been unworthy! The price was paid and the ultimate sacrifice was made. The only part that humanity had to take in this grand plan, was to only believe that it all happened, and why.
Attorney Christian: Sorry Goo but there is no Middle Paleolithic archaeology sites that have not been totally refuted by science. There are no Upper Paleolithic sites that were occupied by anything resembling humans that has not been soundly dismissed by brilliant men of science. It is a known fact there is no fossil evidence. This has been the entire problem of evolution: no fossils. Darwin himself said he doubted any would be found. I am sure he knew why. He even admitted he might have dedicated his life to a fantasy.
The logic goes (and I'm simplifying here): twins should have identical or nearly identical levels of intelligence, and if they don't, then the environment is shaping their intelligence. Most studies suggest that about 3/4 of intelligence differences between individuals can be traced to genes.
And raindrops fell?
Would I make this again? Honestly, I don't know with this one. While the dish was definitely good, I felt like it lacked a punch. I've never had Chicken with Forty Cloves of Garlic before though so I'm not sure how this dish compares to other ones, but I think it definitely needs some red pepper flakes or something to bring it up a notch.
and defend her still today,
Those in the business chasing career fame, glory and riches are sometimes able to get there much quicker if they are the architects of something brand new. The whole awards shebang compounds this situation as what's new is often more rewarded than what's familiar.
No. The vision for Beth Yeshua is much more profound than that. This vision is rooted in REAL CONCRETE visions! From the visions of our fathers for Jews to be in love with Yeshua in a unique covenantal way – to my awkward dreams of animated Lord of The Rings maps. These dreams and visions are real.
* When down into March/April it either confirmed a bear market bottom (2003, 2009) or at least tended to bounce for a few months following declines that had lasted ~6 months (2001, 2008). This is when viewed within the context of a cyclical bear market.
Both cameras feature an attractive new grip design that allows even more comfortable handling. Upper control areas of both models have also been revised with a clear, uncluttered new button layout.
American Soul and Gospel legend, Candi Staton will be performing on The Main Stage on Sunday 15th July. Candi’s voice has captivated generation after generation of music lovers over the globe, and with an illustrious musical career spanning almost 60 years she has an extensive discography consisting of a massive twenty eight studio albums and thirteen singles
Whaddya think??
AFC South:
There are a few other styles on the website, but these are my favorites, especially the top versions of both dress patterns (and I appreciate patterns that show multiple uses in one envelope!) I probably won't be purchasing these two patterns because they remind me so much of something I already own.
Mix with the ginger and garlic pastes.
I ask twice, it means they’ve said it three times already and everybody knows anything after three times is just plain awkward (such as texts not responded to, everyone knows three is the maximum you can send before you may as well send another saying “in case you didn’t know I’m insecure and borderline stalker” – I sent four to DD4L a few weeks back that weren’t responded to, I doubt he even remembers this because to him it wouldn’t have been that big of a deal, but I can’t forget this (to be fair to myself the second one was a correction on a Swype error in the first one so I keep trying to reassure myself that it was technically only three). I’ve gone way off track here I know, I just had to tell someone).
I know the photo, despite the use of the light box, isn't really indicative of anything. It looks like every other roast chicken I've ever made, but let me tell you, this recipe was fantastic. The combination of blueberries and rosemary was just out of this world.
(Read it with a British accent - makes it even more scathing.)
That wasn't quite all the crafting for the weekend though! Those of us who were there are also participating in a year long monthly ATC swap and had decided that we would swap our April and May ATCs whilst away together. That meant I had to make mine whilst there as I hadn't got around to it beforehand! To my relief I wasn't the only one. The top two are the two I made and the bottom two are the two I received.
Here are just a few reasons why I feel this way.
If a private company takes on debt when it is insolvent – ie, knowing that the company will not be able to meet repayments – it is known as ‘reckless trading’. If it can be proven in court that the company is trading recklessly, the directors of that company become personally liable for the debts.
Ella walks into her own bedroom and pulls back her covers. She sits on the side of the bed, slips off her house shoes, and gets in.
But think of the Olympics and you think athletics. The trouble is, apart from Chariots Of Fire, there aren’t that many other movies about runners – or shot putters, long/high jumpers or marathon runners. I guess you could just about squeeze in John Schlesinger’s Marathon Man (1967) – but only just. A better bet would be Tony Richardson’s gritty The Loneliness Of The Long Distance Runner (1962) with a young Tom Courtney whose talent for running sees him rise through the ranks while spending time at an approved school.
A few details...
From this post I hope everyone will learn from MY mistakes. What NOT to do if a boy tries to kiss you...
"For we preach not ourselves, but Christ Jesus the Lord; and ourselves your servants for Jesus' sake...But we have this treasure in earthen vessels, that the excellency of the power may be of God, and not of us...always bearing about in the body the dying of the Lord Jesus, that the life also of Jesus might be made manifest in our body." verses 5, 7 and 10
250g white fondant, rolled
I was trying to get as much momentum as I could going into miles 9-10(that’s typically where most 1/2 marathoners, including myself, hit “the wall”)! As expected, I hit the wall a little after mile 9. To make things worse, there are several uphill stretches over the last 3-4 miles!!
Often however, I think to myself now I have to wait until it grows back and go through that awkward stage. Which I am just coming out of this stage now. Which most likely is why I am hesitant to post a new picture.
1) For my patient, forgiving, and loving husband who recognized that momma needs a break. I am going to get away as much as a nursing baby will allow over the next two days. I.AM.GRATEFUL.AND.I.AM.EXCITED.
26. Scotland gained independence in 1314, after Robert the Bruce defeated the English army at the Battle of Bannockburn.
It used to be a staple anecdote about pubs that you’d wander into an unfamiliar pub and plonk yourself down in a cosy seat only to be told “Sorry mate, you can’t sit there, that’s old Bob’s seat, and he’ll be in in a few minutes!”
confession 4: all of the hobbit is filmed in NZ. you should know that, if you don't already. if you do, you should still know. and richard armitage is in it. ba-da-boom-ba-da-bing. it's extra wicked to find out that you know one of the main actors. double ba-da-bing.
154. Kris is positioned as a rapper in the EXO-M
HERE'S A LIST OF THE TOP 10 CHRISTMAS RECORDINGS THAT I LISTENED TO AS A KID GROWING UP IN THE 1960'S AND 1970S. MY DAD OR I HAD ALL OF THESE LPS, AND I PRETTY MUCH WORE THEM ALL OUT BY THE LATE 1980'S:
Question: Do you ever wonder how some people can wake up everday and tie their shoes. I feel like this everyday I go to class. Some of the people you meet , its a wonder I tell you. I am actually concerned to on the same roads as some of them.
one of my colleagues behaved in a very immature way. it was obvious that he was having some trouble elsewhere. yet, i am not able to incline myself to show sympathy towards him. and, now as i sit here and have to look at him again and again, it irritates me.
Some of the movies included To Kill a Mockingbird, Inherit the Wind, The Accused, Jagged Edge.
